I'm sorry? How exactly does the highest transfer fee ever not make him the most expensive footballer? 
Do you really think he chooses what prayers to answer and which not?  God does not always gets what he wants (example Adam and Eve, Satan, etc, read the answer to the question bellow for more information). If so, why is medicine necessary then, if the result of a sickness was result of God's will, and if he did not intervene, why do you thank him for something he did not do?   You seem to have a misconception that God always gets what he wants. The bible mentions jealousy, that he wants everyone to follow him. However, God also want people to make a choice. Can God truly get both? It does not work that way. Could God had made it work that way, I think no because THAT WOULDN'T MAKE ANY SENSE. "sickness was result of God's will", sickness is not a result of God's will in the first place. Because we live in a 'fallen world'. The world fell when Adam and Eve sinned making God unable to be in their presence without sacrifice or Jesus. This implies that God does not always get his way. And personally, I think god wants every one of to be healed, but he just can't.   Why does he only gives opportunities, love, and pleasure to those with opportunities, but not to those who have no chance of having what they want to have but no opportunism to get it?  Please rephrase this question if you want me to give my best bet at answering it correctly. I don't understand what you are asking. If he does not answer prayers, why pray then? He answer some prayers. The action of praying, in my opinion, is to help strengthen your faith, and sometimes, regardless to the strength of your faith, God will deliver.  Why does God act like an invisible God where we need him and there is no chance we can have what we want?   There seems to be a stigmatism to restrictions in the bible to mean "we don't get what we want". For instance the bible sais not to have sex before marriage, and we all know the issues if you do. There is now a child in this world that requires a person's attention when they don't have another person to help care for the child.   God chooses to be an invisible God because he wants his followers to have faith in him. He wants to give people a choice, so they can follow him or follow this world. I am not saying that this world is a terrible place I know tons of great atheists, but regardless, he wants people to choose. If there was constant miracles all the time there would be no basis for discovery or any drive to create great things. If he made a building every time someone needed a house, how could he sit back and enjoy his creation? People would have no basis on what they can and can't do.  Why when we are full of opportunities and its likely that we get what we want, he appears and blesses us? I think someone else should answer this question. I have no clue.   Don't take my word at face value, research it for yourself. I do not have all of the answers.
Flags are at half mast*   Source: Internet 
He groped 2 nurses. I doubt he requires supervision. Maybe he is challenged, but that doesn't mean he has supervision either.
[Timber by Kesha and Pitbull?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zHESy8XsJPs)  or  [Hey Brother by Avicii](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C3mYhXl3OMQ)
lol It was Call of Duty.  The image is missing.  Infinity Ward is sallllllllty (disclaimer: jk)
Definitely didn't grow up poor haha I was pretty fortunate. My dad worked really hard and made pretty good money. But I was raised not to be wasteful so I guess it's sort of the same concept
Better be the same day. Seriously they own steam so they could make it steam only.
She is *still* doing something selfish.  She has just stated that she *wins* because if they are caught then he will be fired and arrested and she won't. Do you really want to try and make the point that this is ok? Stop saying it in the past tense when this is her current thought.
I have a pretty flawless plan on how to get away with murder should I ever have to.
Just like the pilgrims ;)
It would be very helpful if you could post your measurements according to the [fitting guide](http://www.reddit.com/r/ABraThatFits/wiki/fit_guide). Many, many women are wearing the wrong size. It doesn't take long to do. Even with the botched surgery, I'm sure that we can help!  You definitely don't have to post a picture if you don't want to. What size are you wearing now? How does the bra fit?   * Does the gore (middle part that connects the two cups) sit firmly between your breasts? Not on your boobs or not touching anything at all.  * If you gently pull your breasts forward and up, are they still all covered by the cups, or do they bulge out? [Scoop and swoop](http://brasandbodyimage.com/2012/09/05/putting-your-bra-on-properly/)  * Does your band ride up your back? It is supposed to be snug to provide most of the support.  * Do the wires fully circle your breasts ? Not sitting on them at all?  * Do you maybe have an idea of what kind of [shape](http://www.reddit.com/r/ABraThatFits/wiki/shape_guide) you are?  You aren't "weird" or "gross." All boobs are different and beautiful! There is also a subreddit for ladies who have had reductions (/r/reduction) that you may want to check out if you haven't already.
I think it's ridiculous because, well, simply because it's extra-Biblical. It's so far removed from sex, the argument that it will inevitably lead to sex seems absurd to me. I believe that God is pleased when I kiss my girlfriend, in the same way that He is pleased when I tell her I love her, or when I give her a gift, or do something nice for her. All are signs of love and affection, and God likes those things.  I agree what you're saying about middle ground. What I'm saying is that the "for Christ" route is rarely an extreme. It's usually a matter of not falling into a ditch on either side of the road. Our pastor was telling us about a religious group that decided that all sex was bad, so they separated husbands and wives and laid flour on the floor between their rooms at night and, well, they died out. On the other extreme, there's the free love movement. Neither one are good. The righteous path is usually somewhere in the middle. (Matt 7:13-14)  And as far as lust, yes, I totally agree. Totally. That's why I don't even have any questions about porn being bad. But, in this case, I honestly believe the desires I have for my girlfriend are out of love, not lust. Lust is self seeking, love seeks out to bless others. My desires are to please her, not necessarily myself (although I certainly do know that I would be pleased myself in most- if not all- of those actions). So I don't think I'm lusting after my girlfriend.
Nice, thanks man!
Haha wow, madness. I guess we're really losing our community, huh. It'll be time to move on soon to greener pastures, I suppose... I had one with no upvotes and 8 downvotes, and it wasn't even that controversial because I said food should be labeled as GMOs if they are, in a thread where that was the topic. I tried to argue it out too. So many downvotes and hardly ever an upvote
I have to many RBs (Forte, Chris Johnson, Fred Jackson, Le'Veon Bell, Zac Stacy, Andre Ellington, and Shane Vereen in IR) and crap WRs (Amendola, Decker, Steve Smith, Jennings.)  What do you guys recommend as far as players to target. The team with AJ Green is really hurting at RB (Spiller, Ivory, and Foster and no one else) so I was planning on targeting him, who do you all recommend I offer to start out with. Thanks!
If somebody I'm close to died I am not gonna give a shit what people are wearing.
Seto no Hanayome &lt;3  Not even the most ridiculous scene.
Oh come on, that was funny. Oh right I forgot this is the Internet where no one is ever allowed to say something offensive in a joking manner ever. How dare he/she.
Rain
Taggers, reality show makers, politicians....
Such Funny. Speak for yourself, its not boring to the people who like the sport.
Doggamn IP lysdexia, very tiem.
The battle of Doublelift vs Creaton will be epic. Best marksmans of their respective regions IMHO
might get lucky and one of us might live around you, I've offered help and know a couple of us plumbers are in the bay area. just make sure no water would be able to get into the flexible electrical conduit the wires are coming out of if you threw a glass of water on the area, and that no copper is exposed from the electrical lines, that would be a big big safety issue
My only concern is Profar did not do well in his first Big League stint.  Obviously he's young and needs time to adjust/grow.  But even on defense he was poor, with a UZR/DRS both in the negative.
Yeah, I read your original comment and that person's reaction is just silly. We SHOULD be studying other faiths and belief systems. We will ultimately be influenced one way or another by the things we learned. That's not a bad thing. We SHOULD be questioning the faith, God doesn't ask nor require us to be blind and dumb. If someone completely refuses to learn about other faiths or beliefs, that's sadly a state of stubborn ignorance. As Pope Francis himself said, “I believe in God, not in a Catholic God."
I agree. Just watched this episode yesterday 
I also always notice news outlets call it "sex with a minor" when the woman is older, and statutory rape when the male is. The kids are consenting but not old enough to make those decisions in both cases, it's an equal crime, but shitty journalists don't see it that way. 
Yes
"I don't doubt it, but there's obviously too much risk involved in using possession."  *Kelsey still seems shaken up.*  "I wish she wouldn't beat herself up to the extent that she does. It's hard to watch someone be so hard on herself."
Feinstein shows the reform bill she really wants
Your honor council can suck a fat greasy penis.
Maybe I'm just insane, but I don't think 135 words is very long.
That's what I figured. A friend and I used some on a small qp as well this past spring. It was awesome until the first rain storm fucked it up. We even threw a tarp over it and it still got warped. 
PETA basically think it's better to kill an animal rather than let it be someone's pet. So, they kill many thousands of pets.
YO!
Yeah, you don't want to get that one wrong.
He may be rich, but he seems a hate filled man, and I wouldn't ever want to be like that.
she's a cracking vocalist too
You guys get the mocha shake to?
Call Brucie/Merryweather/Lester.
Yes
The Still paper words this poorly imo, but what they are trying to say is that the ideal flow, mL/min, changes with respect to the column diameter. So you are better off deciding your flow rate with respect to the solvent height change.  If you want to know for a specific column, just mark an inch on your column and push that much solvent out.
hehehehe you're so picky.
Because this particular asshole was waiting for his brats to come back so he could drive them to the next house.
Unemployment benefits require you to have earnt 120k NOK the previous calender year.
I...I'm not sure how this argument makes me feel. Like, it's what I imagine Republicans argue in regards to welfare/disability/helping people and such...but it also seems stupid and cruel.  Wait that actually makes a lot of sense.
Re: Clams  From: st871622@pip.cc.brandeis.edu (not him again) Subject: Re: Bad, really bad, clams.  And Me. Date: Wed, 6 Jul 1994 17:18:18 GMT   In &lt;2va9rf$d0d@access1.digex.net&gt; "goddess@access.digex.net"  "Louise K. Rogow" writes:  &gt;: In article &lt;1994Jul2.004025.11649@news.cs.brandeis.edu&gt;, not &gt;him again &gt;:  wrote: &gt;As I was leaving, they were busy &gt;: putting leather restraints on her. So &gt;much for calming her down. &gt;:  &gt;: 1) Should this be cross-posted to alt.sex.bondage? &gt;:  &gt;: 2) I thought that those restrainst were some synthetic fabric and &gt;: velcro. &gt;:  &gt;: 3) GIF GIF GIF!  1) Well, there was no sex involved - just bondage.  2) There are _many_ different types of restraints available to the - ahem -medical professional: A) The traditional leather restraint - now falling out of favor, since   leather is damn hard to clean, and does not conform to OSHA standards for blood-borne pathogens. B) The new hard plastic restraints, same design as the leather one, but   easier to clean. Every time I see them, brings a nostalgic tear to my   eye. Gone are the days when one could say: "I think he/she/it needs    the _leathers_." C) A pre-packaged, single-use restraint, which is made of foam-padding, and   skimpy-looking straps.   ObAside: I once applied this type of restraint on a person who had just taken PCP. During the ride up to the hospital, I kept whispering in his ear that he had killed his entire family. Since he was rather disoriented, and probably couldn't see straight, _and_ was restrained, I figured he would be no problem.  We arrived at the hospital, wheeled the patient into the ER lobby. He was still restrained to the stretcher. He came to, and the ten minute 'whisper' session I had with him finally connected. With a roar, he rocked back-n- forth, until the stretcher tipped-over, he got to his feet - _with the stretcher still tied to him_, and ran out of the ER and down the street. He then noticed the flimsy restraints on his arms, and snapped them off with a shrug. The stretcher fell away from him, and with another load roar, he ran away, howling into the night.  "He's getting away! Somebody do something!" said a nurse.  "Listen, if you think I'm going after him - you're crazy." said my partner.  "Don't look at me - you're just lucky he didn't think you were a bottle of soda - with a twist-off top."  3) Still trying to take some pixs at calls - give me some time.   ________________________________________________________________________ | Tae-Hyong Kim, NREMT-P, MICT  e-mail: ST871622@pip.cc.brandeis.edu  |  |  Assistant Instructor    Overheard during an autopsy:   | |   Northeastern University   Observer: Did he die of a cardiac arrest?  | |   Paramedic Program Coroner: Well, the baseball bat helped a bit.|   ------------------------------------------------------------------------  : Keep the Faith, Louise who would love some medical-grade leather : restraints  Tae, who would be happy to get a pair for you - only if he gets to apply them
Preparation H does feel good... on the whole.
Can confirm. Is not of view.
SHE'S NOT LIKE THOSE *OTHER GIRLS!* Why can't you just let the kids be kids and stop reinforcing that femininity is to be looked down upon?
hmmm... not exactly what I want :( Would you trade 1 perfect male and 1 4IV female for a pair of male female 4IV Torchic? Sorry, this is the best I can do if it's not a female 5IV :( I really appreciate you trying for it though, thanks!
My friend just told me that everyone was gossiping that I overreact at everything, and were all watching the girl send me FB messages making fun of me. If I did that they would call me a baby, and talk about me more.  I want to do that so badly, but I know i'd get hurt
Harsh, but true. These days a liberal arts degree is just a segue into another field. If that's the case, why spend four years and thousands of dollars for a intermediary when you can study something immediately useful/productive?
Doesn't matter, it's hoodie and hockey jersey season.  Close the door, turn off the porch light, pass me the Twix.
Late Carthage Hoplites.  "Sons of Carthage!"
Ok well have fun setting the neighborhood kid's house on fire if yours gets TPed tonight you lesson teaching sociopath.
I'm not gonna to go dig out the kik convo but she said that she left.
Yeah by safe I meant Rudolph will get targets, and Spiller will get carries. I don't even know if Jones will play 10 snaps tonight. I picked him up as a stash, but got giddy when I saw Sanu won't play. But now I think i'll wait it out till sunday. Thanks!
womp womp womp
What if it was Flexo?
The reviewers were not far off in comparing it unfavourably to God of War, though. I think that was the problem. Don't get me wrong; HS was the first game I played on PS3, and I still have fond memories of the gameplay and the setting (the art direction was just spot on). But it was, at its heart, very similar to a world-crushing franchise.   Going up against God of War was a *very* ballsy move, and I don't think it paid off. Shame, but to really get it back together they would have to completely overhaul the game.
Eleventh has already taken River to Darillium; that's probably when she got the screwdriver too.
That is gonna be so awesome! :D
Excellent. Where did you post your outrage over the media's frequent unwillingness to fact-check right-wing claims?
I was thinking of doing the same thing!
I don't understand the downvotes? I saw all this when I visited the vault shortly after discovering Megaton. Some people just don't take the time to look at the finer details in games.
God, give it a rest, Kwame.
Reddit User /u/budgie Links Another World-Shattering Exposé On Wealthy People Doin' Bad Stuff To /r/sanfrancisco
I went to the bar without a costume. Told everyone I was a Jehova Witness.
Did you view their rank teams match history?
mods can :)
awesomeness
It definitely does! Listen to this woman, she knows what's up!
Amniotic fluid is clear, not red.
Citing reddit is like citing wikipedia. Sure, that's where you *found* the information, but that's not where the information is *from*.  You'd think professionals would know better.
or even use a controller on a pc because you can
I know exactly what Snowden has done, and whilst his revelations about domestic spying were necessary his revelations about the NSA spying on foreign states is little more than treason and espionage. It doesn't serve the American people in the slightest and whilst it does benefit Europeans he's still pretty much acting as a foreign spy. 
Honestly, whenever someone had the bucket out, I emptied that shit. Fuckin suckers take just one, it's all about the diabetes yo
Rusty or not I but he could still thump a bunch of drunks. 
Wow, this takes me back. Immediately after hearing the 'fhe' tone, the Transformer's Theme got stuck in my head. 
Nice eagle animation. 
Twixtor?
Prove it.
Stats for **[Soapysoap93](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/search?q=author%3A%27Soapysoap93%27&amp;restrict_sr=on)** on r/Loans   ---------------------------------------   **Requester Stats**   * [2 Loan(s) Requested](/req_) ([view all posts in r/loans by this user](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/search?syntax=cloudsearch&amp;q=author%3A%27Soapysoap93%27&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;sort=new)) * [0 Loan(s) Paid Back By This Redditor](/paid_) ([view](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/search?q=title%3ASoapysoap93+%5BPAID%5D&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;sort=new)) * [0 Loan(s) NOT Paid Back By This Redditor](/unpaid_) ([view](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/search?q=title%3ASoapysoap93+%5BUNPAID%5D&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;sort=new))   **Lender Stats**   * [0 Loan(s) Granted To Others](/offer_) * [0 Loan(s) Paid Back To This Redditor](/paid_) * [0 Loan(s) NOT Paid Back To This Redditor](/unpaid_)   ---------------------------------------   [member for: 1 year 1 month - total karma: 4,450](/meta_)   ---------------------------------------   [report link](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FLoans&amp;subject=cRedditBot%20Link%20Reported%20-%20redd.it/1pnk8e) or [send feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=interwhos&amp;subject=cRedditBot%20Feedback!)   ---------------------------------------   [Want to start lending? Read this first!](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/comments/19y46n/meta_everything_i_can_think_of_to_give_a_first/)   ---------------------------------------   [Hi! I'm the cRedditBot stats robot. Click here for more information about me.](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/comments/1j54kp/meta_credditbot_information/)   ---------------------------------------
I'm the same way. I used to work in a school with no day shift janitor or regular nurse. I had to deal with all sorts of terrible gym class gone awry moments. Had no problem with that. Kids coming in and saying "look I have a loose tooth" did me in every time.   Oddly enough I've also had my own teeth knocked out and that didn't bother me. Well, I mean it hurt, but losing my teeth wasn't the part that bothered me. 
She is a year old now and is my only dragon.  She is my baby and I love her to pieces.  My heart broke today when I got her results back.  I had her tested just because she was bought from a pet store and I have no background info on her. I have no idea who the breeder was or where she was from. She was housed there together with a few other beardies in the same display terrarium.  I have read about how contagious it is and wanted to know for for my own purposes.  This way I could perhaps be a bit more aware of her health and be somewhat prepared for what could happen.
good luck!
Yup.... and the number of reasons moderators justify the censorship is staggering.  There was a time when posts were rewarded or demoted based on these little arrows that exist right next to both submissions and comments.  Now, up/downvotes pretty much seem like curated junk.  Something can only be popular if the grand poobah of the sidebar decides if it is worthy enough to bless HIS page with it's very existence.  My opinion is that there was a time when mods were accountable.  Moderating was not a decision making process that was cast down from the powers on high, but more of a mutual conversation.... where when a mod really abused power, the community backlashed and these guys were specifically called out.  Perhaps it is a necessary evolution, as I am sure all the whackjobs in the universe come crawling out during "accountability" time and the immense growth has increased the number and frequency of stabby sorts of comments.  But I do think it is unfortunate for Reddit.  And I know, I know.... I could go make my own subreddit or try and be a moderator, but why?  I am sure the job sucks.  When the time comes, I will just get my information and discussion elsewhere.  I have really liked Reddit over the years, but at some point I am sure I will lay it to rest.
HOLY SHIT YOU ARE FUCKING HILARIOUS!!!!
Good job bro!
I'm not sure about "jackass", but I think most liberals are aware that Maher is a comedian, whereas Hannity is "serious".
I wonder if they (Steph and Klay) use this machine to do their 3pt competition mentioned at the end of the SI article.   For anyone that hasn't read it, the game is to shoot (and make) 3s around the arc until you miss twice in a row.   Steph's record is 76. So at worst, if he were to hit every other 3, he shot 76/153 as his last two attempts were misses.   Klay's record is 122. 
Theoretically, you should play them in the order they were released:  * Dead Money * Honest Hearts * Old World Blues * Lonesome Road  However, at your level, you can really start with any. It doesn't really matter. Keep Lonesome Road for last though. It's kind of like another ending to New Vegas. Also kinda hard! 
Excellent.  May he sink unlamented into the mire of media obscurity.
what in the arse was this?
Woot? What does this have to do with incest? What you are talking is child molestation... Also your post does really not sound that rational
Added
Yeah the Eagles are a pretty good team..... HAHAHAHAHAHAHHAA  But in all seriousness, being a QB is much different than being a TE in a run based offense.
sounds awesome, yes please!
Down boy.  Just think, what if she get's pregnant.  The baby would be your step niece-daughter or step nephew-son and if he or she got with your step dad or mom and had a kid with them that one you would be the grandpa to your step brother son or daughter.
To hide them from the aliens
I'm totally going to this. It sounds awesome. 
I got Sakura Karma for my friend who only plays bruisers.
not true, just depends on the metric. if you use "taxi cab distances", for example, then all circles are squares
Most do work, but you only get a few pennies' worth.
What movie is this from?
Reformed guy here, not Catholic (but also not Anti-Catholic, they're really good people), but I'd say continue to study theology, live and breathe bible, devote yourself to prayer, and if Catholicism is what you end up embracing- glory to God! If you come out more reformed than Spurgeon, glory to God! Regardless of where you come out theologically, I'm praying for you! Always seek to glorify and magnify the name of Christ with your life!   /end youth pastor rant
Should have phrased that better. I know the dub isn't up to date with the current episodes of the show, are they released weekly? That's what I'm unsure of.
NO! You are meant to peel the skin off without damaging the flesh, then remove the connective veins so you devour it without trouble.  That's the proper way to eat a mandarin.
You're meeting men attracted to power. As a nester, that is something you will have to forego. Believe me, many men just want a clean house with a beautiful woman in it waiting for them to come home to everyday. and by beautiful, Im not talking your typical model-worthy specimen. I simply mean someone they find beautiful themselves.
Scyther since it's easier on you :) could you attach a metal coat to it? I'll attach a metal coat to zubat so you don't lose yours.
As you get older, you will discover with greater clarity just how many of your friends are truly assholes.  After bearing witness to countless acts along the cheating spectrum, you need to pick your battles, but stay persistent in letting your friend(s) know that you don't approve of their actions.  If you're really friends, they should at least be willing to listen to you.  If they are unwilling, they're just people you hang out with.  Very infrequently, however, will a situation ever arise in which you are justified in betraying your friend for their SO.  This appears to be a good case in which you should just back off.  Maybe you should suggest that he end things with his "gf" if he's going to go for other girls, but maybe this will all blow up in his face anyway.  If he's not really in a relationship, then she may be just as free to act as he is.  The point is that it is always important to act only when sufficient evidence warrants your involvement.  I applaud your desire to intervene - it's hard to (at first) call your friends on their bullshit.  Friends do that, though - they try to make the other better people.  The situation as it is, though, seems not to make it necessary for you to go tell her what you only think you might know...
An accurate description is that they have only the liberties which the state deigns to grant them. Which is essentially the same as having no liberties, since they can change their mind.
Because they do things like this to prevent it.
[the remix is better](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=toEDLIi39mE&amp;feature=youtube_gdata)
Same here. Five months. I used to think I had to drink to have game. Not true. 
Liar, Yearbook pics or GTFO
KC
Physical attacks.
Hey! Your post was removed because it doesn't adhere to the rules of /r/Android.  Please [read the rules](http://redd.it/rkyfr) and submit accordingly! Thank you.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAndroid) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Favre for sure, the Chip Kelly one and the Ravens one. I'd also remove the Stafford one or maybe move it down, he's always been a good, young QB and him taking the next step isn't a surprising as the Chiefs, the Colts being this good, the Chargers being this good, and the emergence of Jake Locker.
The honeymoon period is over,   Understandably there are people from the beta who want the old content flow to continue, but Dota2 has been in production for 2 years? now   their staff are encouraged to work on projects they want to work on, and theyve potentially lost a few staff members now that dota2 looks this good. also I assume there are others who want to jump on the beta bandwagon and yell and scream; expecting their involvement to make a difference in how much content valve release.   But we need to understand ROI (Return on Investment) for valve, Valve have spent many years pumping out features for what we know and love to be Dota 2, and there is already so much content that Dota 2 can now stand on its own as a game.   its polished, stable and has a large number of heros, It's certainly not parity, but Im sure valve can afford to stop pumping out huge changes, because their time is best spent penetrating other markets (the console market)   additionally I wouldnt be supprised if they are storing all that unreleased Dota1 content to support their new update type, of slow and big updates Overall valve is a small company, and they thrive from being one, they will not dedicate a team to Dota2 if resources and staff Will-Power isnt in their favour
That's fucking interesting, man. That's fucking interesting.
baby oil, clearly.
You should! I loved marching in high school and I was so excited to be in it my freshman year at college - our on-campus stadium opened that year AND we made the bowl game that season so the whole band took a bus ride up there for the holidays! I loved moving into my dorm early for band camp, meeting hundreds of people before classes started, and having something to help me blow off steam while anxiously settling into college life.  I also thought I would never go Greek, but I at least rushed TBS and it was great getting to know all the girls there. I would have accepted the bid, but it required enrollment in a music class every semester, and being a microbiology major, I couldn't really make time for it. But first year! Worth it! Stepping in that stadium was like heaven opening up right before me.  Relevant edit: I went to UCF.
Hue! I am THE master detective.
"So do you eat any kind of candy, seeing as you don't like sweet things?"
When I get exactly 160 characters in a text.
That looks good!
&gt; To tell the truth, I would be happy to lose to someone who nets it out and slaughters me on turn 3 or 4. I'm in the game to see the kind of combos that are out there.  I'd make sure everyone else feels the same way first, but if so then absolutely more power to you. Have fun!
Islam is a prominent religion in Africa.
[Sweet pussy have great time](http://l.hh.de/GdixgF)
Exactly. All of these seemingly below-high-school-journalism-level articles on these apologetics websites are just apologists referencing other apologists.
I've actually never played a 3v3 game, but after seeing those maps... they look awesome!!!
Premature ejaculation problems :(
How does this even work in your head?  Someone is out on the streets, preaching their religious views as if they're more important than someone else's views. The Christian is  disagreeing with their religious views, broadcasting his speech over a microphone with an amplifying speaker. That's being a dick and disrespecting other peoples' views.
He gets the views because, as I said, he's down to earth. There's no acting, there's no jump-cuts, he also mentioned that the raw video would be uploaded because of it being a Twitch Livestream.  It's a big deal, he has 12000+ videos uploaded since 2009, How many of those will get hit with copyright ID matches? How will he or anyone else that's a smaller youtuber fight back, without the assistance of a network? Youtube is harder to contact than the bloody pope.  He's got 260m+ views also down to his comedy style while playing and the fact he sometimes uploads an entire game's playthrough on day one of release. The benefits of having great internet.
Upvoted for publicizing the book; it's terrific. The sequel, not so much, but The Unincorporated Man just rocks.
What nature?
The trick is to counter 1 hero, you pick two heroes, and blow both their ultis for a chance at killing him, and your opponent will immediately push and fight and you won't be able to do shit. Sounds good
Was she a slutty cat.
Make time for each other. Give at least a single evening of the week dedicated to one person and what they want to do, and another evening of the week dedicated to the other person.
415 Unsupported Media Type - this is a generic SIP message that is almost always a codec problem.  Wish I knew more about Lync to help with the specifics but I would investigate if you have a permitted codecs list and determine which one it's requesting to use.
This is quite alright to me. Let my Harvin cookies bake a little longer
Pick a side, commie
This might sound silly, but may I suggest a change to your character to the effect that you forgo the emotional charge of your first two paragraphs? The projection of your mental energy reinforces the problem you perceive rather than dissolving it when you let yourself speak negatively about generalized 'people'. The habit doesn't become you. Your time is better spent in positive pursuits, and you can still address the same problem if you so choose but with a constructive and analytical air.  'Others' will take work, but you can be free with the sheer force of your will.  Do you want to be positive or do you want to be negative?
you don't say?
Maybe he is Jewish. (On a second thought... maybe pig wouldnt be the best symbol for that either)
Your mother is the coolest fucking person EVER.
Yeah. I just ended succumbing to the couch tour. Maybe we can all band together and figure out something for the NYE run.
I would not advise that. That man has 15 years experience
The good guy didnt use them on their own citizens. 
I have miss the first quarter due to stupid Uni but hoping for a good game and game thread.  \#KnicksTape
I hate calling black people African Americans, just like I hate being called Caucasian.  Their skin is black, my skin is white, people with variations of black skin are black, people with variations of white skin are white.  If I can't tell what color you are because you're somewhere in the middle... well, honestly, who gives a shit, I'm gonna treat everyone the same. 
Unfortunately I was not raised in a good neighborhood. However, I don't blame my parents. I couldn't ask for better parents. They didn't do anything about it, because I never told them about it :/
Down the road when STEP 2.3.0 comes out there will be a Core package for STEP and then a bunch of packs that you can plug and play for different playthroughs. Civil War, creatures, weapons and armor, old-school RPG, and a bunch of others as we come up with ideas.  You are correct though about getting it stable and just leaving it until your playthrough is over. I try not mess with my setup until I get bored of character.
What's the proper way to install this netting?
I don't believe you.
Holy shit I just bursted out laughing in front of everyone
True.
Navos brought up his sword to counter swipe. To his surprise they clanged against one another. *It countered my soul sword?* he wondered.  "That is an impressive blade," Navos dug his sword into the ground. He swung up, kicking up a cloud of dust toward his opponent. Navos then ran around the man as fast as he could, dragging his sword into the ground. He caused the dirt to swirl into a mighty whirlwind.  "But not as impressive as mine!"
Here is a pretty good list. http://www.thenaturalpetcenter.com/canned_cat_food.html  Basically anything without fillers like grains, wheat, veggies.  The ideal can would be straight up meat only.  But that is hard to find unless you go frozen raw. If you can prepare your own raw mix then that is the ultimate luxury for your cat. I give my guys fussie cat.  Obviously, you will have to adhere to your cat's tastes.  Take in mind your cat may not enjoy the weening off dry food.  Dry food is very delicious because its junk.  You might want to save some dry and start mixing wet into it.   Good luck.  
I THOUGHT UP THIS ONE WHILE AT WORK.  ----  [](/scootaderp) For 700 gems, I'll teach you how to fly!  [](/sp)[](/spikemeh) There's so much wrong with that, I don't even know where to start.  [](/sp)  ----  .... It was a busy day.
^GhostTea killing it on a consistent basis
Yes you could.  Once I got decent enough with counterattack timings and the hidden blades I would leave dozens of slaughtered guards in my wake everywhere I went.
only like a handful of tracks... but that's what i expected coming in..  the three standout tracks for me were: headlights, legacy, and love game
Alright, fellas here's the rub. Home is black/white, away team is tan/white w/ the butcher knife and helmet. [Who ya got?](http://i.imgur.com/adtjT6V.jpg)
Passive aggressive behavior, trying to push people buttons or get under there skin and General dickishness really gets on my nerves. Its petty and its petulant.
Downvote for saying moist.
Don't hold out on me subban, spill those beans
This thread is for changing people's minds and coming in with an open mind, not for judging. Please put more thought into your wording. 
That's probably true, and while I'm sure I'm getting downvoted as a result of your comment as a rebuttle to what I said, I'm merely pointing out that _no_, the average cop is _not_ physically abusive. That was the original claim.
What country do we think we are?
I wouldn't bother with grading that. There were over 12 million minted, and this isn't worth more than its weight in silver. Sending it in to grade would cost more than its worth. 
Welcome to Early Adoption..? That's how it works when you jump on new tech, it might have kinks and those might need to be fixed.
Just don't even bother. I'm pretty sure even the mods on that subreddit hate meta. Don't ever expect them to like meta or talk about it positively and just get ready for more shitpost Boxer/Aliens/Dark Magician talk.
Tell a half-assed, shitty racist joke. Works every time.
Been using an iphone for a while (please don't hate me) and i have been waiting for this for forever, ordered my 32gb nexus 5 and i can not wait for it to come in! Hopefully it's not too long, said it would leave the warehouse by November 8. 
As a former Tory the question should always be "Will this cost a MP any money they can't claim back?" if the answer is yes then it's definitely not a Tory policy, if it's no you have to ask "Will Debs and John from the club have to pay this as well?" as a follow up, if the answer is yes then it's also not a Tory policy.  
supposedly it was a facebook group of indie rap industry insiders, rappers, and producers that were involved in creating her. 
Yowza.
The 510s fit exactly like 511s in the thighs, but are more tapered below the knee.
S'truth.  I need to go knock over a 7/11 or something.
Ok let us assume they are on the same power level. So lets see the bets and worst case scenarios for both sides. Also Aang isn't going to use his Avatar state because that is a near Omega level threat.  Johnny will take out Zuko very easily as he absorbs flames.  Sue takes out Aang with a force bubble in his throat just to knock him out.  Ben fights Katara and no amount of water bending can hurt his rocky exterior as it is wayyyy too tough.  Reed leapes and glides in the air so Toph can't 'see' him and he gets too close to her and disables her.  Now for the flip side.  Toph might be able to bend Ben because... rock guy, duh.  Zuko takes on Reed because it don't matter how bendy you are when people can burn you.  Katara takes on Sue with blood bending but if not she could just freeze her in ice. Plus Katara is quick enough and clever to fight Sue.  Aang has taken out the Firelord with Zouzen's Comet with avatar state so a Human torch should be not so hard even without the Avatar state.  All in all these are the best case even scenarios when you try to balance them... maybe use Movie/Cartoon versions of the FF and disable the Avatar state.  But at full power I think Sue or Human Torch could destroy the whole team on benders with a Supernova or Sue's force fields.
What did you decide to do instead? I'm assuming you have your BS. What were you able to do with it? I graduated in 2009, have held no job in my field, and think I have lost most of my self esteem. After I married I gave up on getting a PhD. Military life never leaves you in one place long enough to complete it. Masters, maybe.
Meh, Liverpool isn't too bad as everyone makes out :)
If you can show a picture, we can tell you if that looks normal, or if something is off.
I havent been on in a couple of weeks, we have NEW pokemon? I thought it was only 68 or something.
The office for sure!!!   That show was such an emotional roller coaster and honestly basically every single episode is hilarious.  The Jim and Pam relationship, Michael and holly,  I even cried!!
Good question, possibly, first party games will offer pre order bonuses digitally for a week or two. So option is in place for 3rd parties to use that.  But no confirmation on COD technically.
This is what happens when equal rights turns into second wave feminism. You see it all over the world. Japan is the most advanced as obvious by the two links in this post  http://www.theguardian.com/world/2013/oct/20/young-people-japan-stopped-having-sex  http://newsfeed.time.com/2013/10/22/japans-hottest-new-sex-trend-is-not-having-sex/  But you also see it in scandinavian countries as well. Where like with Julian Assange 2 occurrences of consensual sex can be turned into rape two weeks after the fact when the two women meet each other.   It is creeping into America as well. Well to do or successful men are avoid marriage like the plague due to massively unfair divorce &amp; child custody laws and judicial decsions going the womans way 80% of the time despite the fact 65-90% of "No Fault" divorces are started by women. To the tune that 38% of men under 30 don't see marriage, family, or children as an important step on lifes road and this number is increasing. On the flip side woman are wanting to marry in an increasing numbers but if they are successful they refuse to marry down,   **TL;DR** Women are taught to have unrealistic expectations and men are no longer interested in dealing with asshole women.
I rode with a rear like that on my Triple for a day just to see how it would handle.  Must be an Aussie thing.
I need this. Now.
Sorry, this is my first pokemon game since Ruby :(
I hate this too. Like if you play guitar you have to be some wannabe rock star. As if it's akin to moving to LA to "be in movies." No I actually just enjoy music and find playing to be deeply satisfying, isn't that enough? People who do are admittedly kind of annoying (that one friend who's in a shitty band who invites his entire friends list to vote for him on Facebook or whatever), but we're not all like that.  I actually am hesitant about admitting I play because you generally get one of two reactions:  1) You want to be famous 2) You want to get women
The idea of making Seals, Marks, and Glyphs have unique functions is great, but if you are maintaining tier rune structure do not make it about powerlevel. Lower tier runes should be less flexible, higher tier runes should be more flexible.  Imagine if T1 runes took up 9 rune slots on a page?   And if T2 runes took up 3 runes slots?   T3 runes could be the same and have up to 9 on a page.    * T1 Armor Seal x1 = 13 Armor = 1200 IP Total   * T2 Armor Seal x3 = 13 Armor = 1400 IP Total   * T3 Armor Seal x9 = 13 Armor = 1845 IP Total   TIER 1 RUNES WOULD HAVE MINIMUM FLEXIBILITY, AND BE VERY SIMPLE. Tier 2 would be slightly more flexible.   Tier 3 would be the most flexible.    Pricing should lean toward accessibility for newer players. Less flexibility cheaper price. Simpler customization for lowbies with more flexibility for more advanced user who take the time to farm up to have a particular set up.   Unlock runes slots as you level up should be adjusted to accomodate the change in slot occupation. Maybe the technology for that would be to difficult to develope before Season 4 starts, but it should not severly impact competative play and only make it more accessible to new users, while still encouraging more rune purchases.  
I'm pointing out that it's the difference between ounces when we're measuring metric tons of steel.  You're also not being very nice.  Be nicer.
Good call! Andrew is definitely throwing a switch toeside. 
Legal asset forfeiture for the win!  /s
Even if they clinch the division they are going to want home field advantage throughout and may have to keep up wi th SEA or SF
What if the kidnappers make me twerk for them :(
What class is it?
Flies? Yeah, I have them too.
Example: hungover me stumbling to work this morning, each step like a punch to the torso. Walking to the side of the footpath and see 3 people walking towards me on the path. I pull myself as far as I can to  my left side, anticipating them to do the same.  Nope. They continue walking and chatting and taking up the whole path, forcing me onto the grass. *Seriously?*  Fuckers.
Adding to this, I believe studies have been done using FMRIs which found no difference in brain activity between circumcised and uncircumcised men while performing sexual acts, so the brain actually perceives sex the same way whether or not you have a foreskin.  Edit: Forgot the word "been"
sure, lets go with that one for now.[](/ajlie) 
What do you do OP? I mean.. what is your trade, what is the interview for?
Naniwa put out a $500 dollar bounty on Revival.
I think the parents should be responsible for that. It's obviously plaque or decay. And the child was only 3. Those teeth need to last at least like 3 more years, they would have probably been rotting by then. My point is that I doubt either of the parents were spectacular. The father for obvious reasons. 
That is a good point, he possibly has a health issue. Though, I don't want to be rude or anything.. just a polite way to approach the situation, as it is distrubing to other colleagues.
Your whole body is just the means your DNA uses to replicate itself
Join a local cooking group. Grocery stores often have them.
Not everyone is cut out to be a person on a stage, like not everyone is cut out to play professional basketball or fly a jet. Not everyone gets nervous before they get on a stage.  You're making a lot of sweeping statements in order to defend this person who performs very poorly under pressure. I'd also like to add that she's been attempting to do this for three years and the event she was doing this at was presented by a major corporation.
Beautiful car. Love the mudflaps on a BRZ. Brand? yours look good, not too big. It may not have all wheel drive, but I still say it's a Subaru through and through.
post the # on some popular,relevant reddit and let the interwebz do the work for you. unfortunately im fairly new to reddit so i can't point in the right direction, but someone probably can
Crazy.
What?  Generic trentinoin is like $30 a tube without insurance. 
Working in a meat department, I get really tempted to slap someone with a fish. 
It's a nationally televised game on TNT.  You guys are good.  
Or any recession ever.  "The economy's going to shit? Well fuck, I can't invest now!"
Haha. I read about it in the local paper. In my town it's called "Operation Porch Lights Out," and offenders are under surveillance. They can stay at home, but the porch light must be off and they can't answer the door. Either that or they're kept at a secure location like a courthouse as OP says. Weird.
they prefered to go un-named....this was all a neogaf ploy. :P
Not sure if I'm with you with the "slightly better" battery life (I think it should be substantially more), but I see your position. 
Sounds more like issues with your mechanics/understanding of how to win in SoloQ.
But then you'd be ignoring interest.
The guidestones are for AFTER a great calamity has struck the world, bringing our population below that in the first place.
I don't think it's a slur to be honest. Also, if history is any indication, calling Crosby gay is nowhere near an instant lifetime ban. 
I think Vick too, he's just going to keep agrivating that hamstring and you have Matt Ryan who has already had his bye
Uhh no.
depending on what kind of sweets :)
I lived there for a year (2012), Minnehaha and Forest more or less.  Not my favorite place.  A girl was shot and killed in my back alley.  Months later police arrested two guys in our backyard that were apparently about to break in.  My friend lived in a duplex a couple blocks away.  He was robbed twice in 6 months. I moved away as soon as my lease ended.  
Thanks!  I'm not one to eat anything but well-identified mushshrooms anyway. Love my chantrelles and morels though.
No wonder I was never raped and/or molested on halloween
As a kid from a Christian household who didn't have a costume (or only a very partial one), but snuck out anyway, this would simply feel like rubbing it in.
I would argue that, while not conscious, caterpillars still think.
479 others agree
A [pedophile](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pedophilia) is someone who is *attracted* to young children. It does not have anything to do with them actually engaging in sexual conduct with any minors.  Ain't no such thing as a pedarist. Though I suppose you might be mixing that word up with [pederasty](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pederasty), which is a homosexual relationship involving an adult male and a pubescent male.
Almost looks like sourdough. I wonder how that would taste.
They half asked it though. If it was me meeting the Alex guy I'd have been pulled over and searched. They did a good job of not having to actually charge him with anything.
&gt; I think people who've earned what they have, or else have taken it from a state of nature by their own effort, have a right to keep what they've thereby earned.  So this is your distributive principle. The words "aggression" and "coercion" mean nothing for your theory actually. Right? Because if this principle wrong, then what you currently call defense, would actually be aggression, correct?  My point here is talking about aggression and coercion when we have differing theories of entitlement literally does nothing. It's basically a 100% waste of time. Right? Because those words only get their meaning derivatively from a theory of entitlement.  ALL economic philosophies in the history of the existence of the world believes in the NAP. Every one of them. They believe it is wrong to use violence that is inconsistent (aggression) with their theory of what belongs to who. And they believe is correct (defense) to use violence that is consistent with it.  But there is one theory in the history of the world whose adherents literally think that you can prove who is entitled to what by appealing to NAP. That's what's so amazing.  You go: I believe X is entitled Y because of the NAP. And then I go, but why is taking Y a violation of the NAP. Well because X is entitled to it! HAHAHAHA. You justify your theory of entitlement by appealing to NAP, and then justify your definition of NAP by appealing to your theory of entitlements. It's fantastically circular.  So all I am asking is this. Will you agree -- when someone disputes your theory of entitlement -- to never ever ever say the word aggression in the context of that debate? Because you realize it literally does nothing in the debate at all. It says "I think X is entitled to Y because I think X is entitled to Y."
We need 2 trillion over 10 year in new infrastructure, bridges, roads, etc. A recession would have been the perfect time to start working on that. Estimates point out that the refusal to fund the needed new construction will result in our 2020 GPD being 3 trillion lower than expected. This was all in a time when construction workers had a 13% unemployment rate.
How anybody was initially fooled by this is beyond me.  I mean, clearly 2 different pens were used...
No, it's GIta Massacre.
Britta?
Damn, Houston is FAST.
I HATE it when people say "attempt" jeez! you know its good! just say MY _______ pumpkin! who do you think you are trying to be modest? a special sweeper?  p.s. nice job though!
Who needs soldiers who know how to handle themselves in a fight?  When I think of a professional I think of a bald 18 year old.
&gt; But you're right, there is a cultural stigma to it.  Which is why it is fun to use, especially up north.
I assume it's because nobody will help them.
Trick &gt;:3
Fluttershy would walk right up to a werewolf and pet it.
Shit that is super nice. It even has a switch built in. I thought it was straight pulls somehow. Technically you need cat 6athough since it trchically 10gb/s
The football team's injury bug must be contagious.
*facepalm* Do you really believe he bombed it?
v
I know back when I used to play I would sit and chop trees while watching a movie or something. I would zone out and not really pay attention to the game with my chat off; thinking back on it I could have easily been targeted for looking like a bot.
My cat does this when I drive in the driveway after being out all day. She will lay right in the middle of the road and will not move until you nearly hit her. We used to stop for her, but now we just keep driving. She always seems to get out of the way in time. XD 
FUCK! I Was NOT prepared for that!!!!!
Try being around when TF2 was originally announced. Announced in 1999, talked about for a few months, then nothing for nearly seven years. 
They are spreading stories about a few Glocks from years ago.   Cartridge is fine. 
how so?
Boobs don't exactly encourage random acts of violence or nothing but its pretty awkward when you are watching a movie with your son and he starts jacking off over some dude with tits.
Mines will ship on the 8th :( Why 3 days later!
I lold in class
Stand around and pay attention. I'm still a part of the team so I'm expected to go 
You'd be smart too but you'd also be wrong. It's collect all miracles. That channeler's trident though, i thought i'd never get one.
Hey guys!  I've been running Indy 169 Stage 10's with 65mm Cult Convertors on my Comet Shred 32 for the past couple of months. I weigh 65kg (140ish lb).  I've been using it heavily for commuting, but also for some low to moderate speed skids.  I'm running them on Bones Hardcore Mediums, with 1/8" Shock Pads. I was running them with a washer boardside, but that changed the geometry, and began to deform the bushings. After having taken out all washers (now just using the bones inserts) the trucks have been completely unlocked.  I used stock Indy bushings for about 2 hours. As anyone who's seen Indy bushings will know, they aren't exactly precision items. The bottom of my bushings (there is a VERY clear bottom to each Indy bushing) looks like it was cut before the urethane was set. There are cracks and folds. It has a very inconsistent surface.  If you're looking into buying Indy's, I'd absolutely recommend a full bushing upgrade. I'd personally reccomend Bones Hardcore (For &lt;120lb, Medium for 120-160, Hard for &gt;160). Having said that, I've heard great things about Khiro and Reflex's street bushings. (Riptide also has a street bushing series, which I'd love to hear about if anyone has had any experience)  As with any other TKPs these bushings are inherently less stable at speed than RKPs. The tighter you run the bushings, the more 'stability' you're going to have. On my Bones Double Cones, I'd not be comfortable running these much faster than 20mph, but that's just my comfort zone, and more capable riders could absolutely run them faster I'm sure. The first Indys were designed with the intention of being the first downhill skateboarding trucks, I believe.  I noticed the instability a lot more when bumboarding. Even at around 10mph, I was having difficulty managing the wobbles. Remembering that these trucks are narrower too than standard longboard trucks.  Do they turn sharply? Hellz yeah they do. Indys dive for DAYZ. Later on into the turn is where Indys really shine. They're a fantastic feeling truck for commuting.  The bushing seat is a little bit restrictive and snug on the boardside, but is quite open on the roadside. I'm used to describing RKP bushing seats, so I'm a little at a loss for words here. Someone will be able to do a better job.  Indys are the kings of durability for the cost IMO. Remembering that street skaters thrash these trucks to pieces should say enough about their durability. They're tough mother fuckers. I'll happily drop large curbs without a second thought, which is a lot more than can be said about many popular RKPs.  I have raw finished trucks, so, no, the paint hasn't come off. The hangar has scratch marks, but that's all part of the game.  On the whole these trucks have been absolutely fantastic for me. I was running surfrodz on my shred before I found these, and they'd slip out far too easily, due to the inappropriate hangar size for the board (177mm).  I have so much more control. Highly recommended.  EDIT: It's worth mentioning that these trucks are insanely low. They feel like half the height of Cal 50s when pushing. I also get no wheel bite, but that's mostly due to a combination of Comet's perfectly placed sanded wells, the 1/8" risers, and that my trucks are not very loose. Having said that, I'd feel uncomfortable riding them much looser.
I was playing short stop at a family baseball game, and the batter hit a straight drive right past the pitchers (my dad) left ear, and without moving my body, I just threw my left arm out and caught it like I didn't give a fuck, then I turned around and got my drunk grandfather out at second. 
Oh dear this one is extra stupid.
turd-breath.
Just a heads up, like any MMO, leveling after the first time is boring as hell and generally not as fun as your first time. So take your time with the first character. Don't rush, and enjoy your first leveling.
Time traveling to the future is possible, just very impractical.
That's the way it is.
yes.
For now...
 So meta
Brakes.
I have now tried the two minutes and nothing better.
Drug safety/pharmacovigilance in a contract research organization. No patient care. It involves a fair amount of writing and it almost exclusively computer work. Nurses are highly favored and can rise to director level in this field within 7-10 years if they are good at it.
Invest on the stock market 
Random bashing on Corporation X over Corporation Y belongs in BestOf?  What the hell, guys?
I'm against workers being forced into anything. If they're going into poor countries, kidnapping workers, and forcing them to work on a boat, I'm against that. I don't think that's going to happen. And I'm not for doing anything *instead* of creating a path for citizenship. I think we should do both - create a path to citizenship *and* come to terms with poor people taking advantage of better wages even if they don't become a citizen.
Customers disrespecting employees. I can not stand seeing someone disrespecting an individual that is offering a service, especially when the customer thinks they are entitled to act like that because they have a "better" job than the employee
&gt; The cursor moves on other computers but not the first one?  yes  &gt;Also, maybe it has something to do with this "Unify" tech that Logitech has put out. Look into making sure you have that set up properly.  it's worth checking again, but I think it's set up correctly
Missing Att (duh) and SpD and it's male 
It's like that for everyone, it's quite annoying.
Is this where I try out for left tackle?
Whenever im driving next to a semi-truck, i think about how if one of its tires pops, that huge trailer will swing right into me, possibly flipping top of me
Smells really strong... not bad.
Yea... but that's kind of the point of advertising... appeal to people's stupidity and apathy to look it up themselves :)
Dude! You did my Carthage game in the other direction? Sweet! Now I have to up the stakes, I was certain I was going to win with that :p
*SHOOP*
*Steeples fingers Mr. Burns style* Excellent! Ive always wanted my own indentured servant...
Looks like a birds tail coming out of the sauce there!
I don't dislike them (as I know some people in that very category who are solid) but think thats what Abbott was gunning for, knowing lots of them probably go labor because of the union association. get em on board by disparaging "illegals" (who mythically somehow get more centrelink money than pensioners!") and calling blondes sexy as a reason for their continued employment  
The good feelings are never ending.
**[TBangz](http://para.ms/reus/TBangz)**: [^^original ^^reddit ^^link](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/1pnj2k/a/cd42ubm/?1pnjga)  Not a conspiracy but wow, TIL.
Now introducing the iShave from Apple, a revolutionary new* invention. 
&gt;The key difference between this and the Japanese is that we compensated the actual people who were wronged.  I suppose some Japanese-Americans alive during WWII were alive in 1988, when reparations were given out. But reparations were were given not only to survivors, but to their heirs as well.  &gt;Does this get us off the hook for all future claims?  What do you mean?
Thank you.
DotaTV is cool I guess.  It's less a revolution and more an easy way for them to monetize tournaments by making them slightly more convenient to watch.  I don't see how that's relevant to anything.  Dota2 is fun and playable, sure.  They don't need to do projects just for the sake of working.  But I would say the game is lacking in a couple big areas.  Hero pool still isn't complete, there's no good excuse for that.  There are still significant bugs in the game, most of them aren't gamebreaking, but some of them are.  There's no competitive/ranked mode.  Ladder seasons are what kept me coming back to dota1 and brood war, and it's a core part of any competitive game IMO.  It's also core for replayability.
Different hair thickness and air access and stuff like that.
I don't even bother making it a road bike.  I've got a mountain bike but no unpaved areas to ride it.  Throw on some shorts and hit the (less traveled) roads.  It's fun and way more approachable than the people who ride around looking like sponsored sperm.  
Its fine that my mask isn't movie quality.
fuck you bitch you know you're hot
Atheists make me want to give up Atheism and convert to Christianity.
I'm a PAL/WAR and I can tell you from my personal experience... with 50+ wins, I've never even seen the WAR weapon. 
&gt; Block it, Light it, Rehearse it, Shoot it.  Seriously do this. So many student directors think that a DP is supposed to figure out how to light a scene with no one in it.
The only reason Obama himself has been so quiet over this whole affair is because they still don't know what Snowden took that could be used against him. An alarm bell in itself!  Instead he "takes the fifth" which is the only way he won't incriminate himself.
Is that even possible? :O
Walk through nature alone. Orrrr sing an upbeat song, regardless of your singing skills.
I just tried to hit the [Close] button on that picture.   Don't worry, I'm already on my way to my helmet fitting. 
Yeah.   So when someone says "I'm not evil" it's sort of not actually reassuring at all.   In fact, that they're convinced they're good can actually lead them to doing evil acts, as they don't consider it a possibility that they could be doing the wrong thing. 
It's pretty great actually.
Ahhh, that's actually a good idea!
Vanilla Day 1: Tron/Haggar/Wesker Vanilla End: Wesker/Tron/Phoenix   Ultimate day 1: Dormammu/Akuma/Wesker Ultimate now: Wekser/Dormammu/Doom
It depends on if you're a creative or something else. Creative positions are much harder to find, lower paying, and you have to work longer hours than some other positions, such as account planners.
That it does and the ferroseed would be great
No bby. I'll hold you tight.
That's not *too* bad. What would be way worse is if he did that for a couple of goals, noticed you went AFK, then tried to tie and turn the game around while you were gone.
Yea, man the #1 GDP in the world, is ranked 37th in Health Care by the WHO. We're doing fucking great.
Im not atheist, but who celebrates halloween for something other then candy xD
*should have.   I hope you heal quickly
They weren't supposed to be lasers in this scene. They were just training. Look at what she's wearing.
Not to mention it can be extremely difficult if not impossible for trans* people to naturally reproduce. HRT often shuts off semen production and stops menstruation/ovulation. Artificial insemination is sometimes possible, although it can be risky.
They had one net that you could stand behind and they drive at you.
Sure!
I remember using this Alphasmart thing in elementary school. It was basically just a portable text editor in a keyboard, and it lasted most of the school year on four AAs. If they made one with a decent e-ink screen, that would be the greatest writing device since the pencil.
Can we stop turning popular Vines in to GIFs to repost to Reddit. I already avoid Vine for this same shit.
It was post TI2 they really cut down on letting us know what was happening, it kinda sucks tbh.
Crowesbase is still very much alive.
That's the technical term.
I WANNA PRANK PEOPLE xD
may i have one? female if you can help it.
It smells fine. It might taste slightly bitter but it could just be in my head.
Beats me man, maybe there were changes that need to be addressed. I didn't say I was definitively right, was just my thought. 
It's actually a well constructed sentence that unfortunately allows for misreading. Corporate America *seeks* gender blindness. It doesn't achieve it, nor does it make a huge effort to gain it. She's more trying to point out that he's popular because he removes the tensions from what so many Australians feel is an unnecessary political correctness with respect to gender difference. I can't say I disagree with the point (as in that's what Australia is responding to).   Like much of what is currently occurring in broad strokes since the government came in, insufferably slow progress apparently has to take a 10 year backward step to recalibrate for subsequent insufferably slow progress. Addressing climate change? Let's go back to before Howard wanted to introduce an ETS. Infrastructure? Let's build bigger roads to channel cars into urban centres. 
We always get temps in where I work. Usually we keep them on after the person comes back from maternity leave. We've added a few employees that way. 
Not the biggest fan of the lips, but otherwise that's an amazing pic.  In only a few months this artist has improved so much, I'm jealous!
Creep
He was in it for the money:  https://twitter.com/LiquidTaeJa/statuses/396063842725154816
"Imma wreck dem tittys!"
Sure. :D The more the merrier!
Seconded. I'm flying out on the 9th December. I can tell that this November will seriously drag!
Gates open
August 28 is my dads birthday! 
Women who like to be dominated don't usually go around telling everyone that they like to be dominated (for obvious reasons). That said, I think it's actually a pretty common desire, at least in my personal experience.
You don't have to be found guilty in a court of law to make yourself unfit to be mayor.  The job of mayor is to represent the city, and to marshall Council into getting stuff done.  To *do his job*, the mayor needs credibility, but as of now, in the court of public opinion (except for a handful of delusional Ford Nation members), Ford is already guilty.  Now he has no influence, he has no reputation, therefore he can't do his job properly.  And that's why he needs to step down.
Ah, but God is immortal and cannot be killed, so now you have a logical contradiction.  Which the entire concept of God is plagued with. The more you think about it, the more you need to "whittle" God down to make him logical, until he's basically reduced to the status of a mere mortal.
That actually makes a lot of sense. Thanks for the honesty.
then why call it "magic"? if it's a complicated, ritualistic form of meditation, just call it meditation. i swear i will never understand why people feel the need to wrap themselves in so much silly fluff.
Greed. Selflessness. Disparity.
Switching has priority over Mega Evolution. In your example, Player 2 would switch in Tyranitar, and activate Sand Stream, only to have Charizard evolve into its Mega form and bring on the sun.
I'm going to PM you a question about this
The gods he swore to are in the trees, and there were no trees there, only water. 
Naruto would have accomplished lots by killing Nagato. The feeling of revenge is a rush, and is awesome. It is not all-consuming, contrary to what Kishimoto represents it as.  Not all villains have to be killed, yes, but consider the world they live in. People die left and right. Someone has to be killed eventually, specifically villains.  Ah, I misunderstood. Sorry, I have a tendency to do just that... sorry.  Anyway, yes, that's exactly what I'm saying. But that is a discussion I have debated in another place, and I have no wish to discuss that.  Sometimes things are black and white. Itachi could have not gone ahead and killed his family. Sarutobi and/or Danzo could have ordered someone else to kill them.
Certain words if you think about them long enough.
What else?
Thank you so much for the recommendations! I went with Amnesia, but I'm also thinking about machine for pigs, any idea if it's good?
TRICK MWAHAHAHA
Supports now get so much gold you'd probably be able to afford it.
Use the mystics if you have a bunch of stones left over from Achievement chests.
top lel
People said the same thing when Walkmen and Gameboys were all the rage. Somehow me and my fellow millennial friends still got good grades, went to college, and [mostly] became fairly successful.
needs more lawrence
It's not a gimmick, I don't use it to commit crime behind anyone's back. This is the account I play on and use in Aytos most of the time, and I like to keep reddit consistency with that.
If one drive is enough to hold the data then it's not Big Data
Donʻt do this. Bad idea. I was a teenager once, they will win. Give them a mini Snickers bar, no note.
With most (all?) document viewers you can simply click a rotate button.
its your fucking choice. Why do you need our opinion?
Definitely some sort of deformed Elfin Saddle.  It looks like it's succumbing to a Hypomyces mold, too.
Added
I bought a slim fit XS OCBD in white two months ago and I love it. It can be easily worn untucked. However I do prefer the fit of my J. Crew Factory XS slim fit OCBD in blue. 
31/31/31/x/x/31 M/Adamant/Tech Friend Code:2122-6505-3428 IGN:Cronac
That shot chart actually proves that he isn't a slasher.  What slasher attempts that many shots in mid and 3pt range?  I'm not saying that he doesn't score inside, just that he attempts less shots inside that other players yet still draws fouls at a higher rate than them.  Last season, KD attempted 19% of his shots inside compared to LeBron's 35% but drew fouls at a rate of 17% compared to LeBron's 13%.
It's because girls are primarily judged on appearance and then everything else. It's like we exist solely to look good for people. 
To my knowledge, deadmau5 only uses Ableton Live, but has a bunch of analog synths on stage with him. He uses Cubase and FL Studio too, but only in his studio.
But why do they bleach them then?
Like I'ma take that halberd and violate some summoners.
November 15, sadly. There are channels dedicated to simply [breaking high priced electronics](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uwn-Tfc4P2Q).
Heh. I tend to get these fairly often as I spend a lot of time in the main city near the AH. Usually its something small like 100-500. Most of the time Ill chat them up a bit and see if they're really in need of the money or they are just fishing for it. Talked to a guy yesterday who wanted 100g for some kind of mount training. I talked to him for a while and ended up giving him 5k since he seemed like a nice guy and was friendly.
Nice twist in the end there! :)
yeah im seeing talbot as a 2013 yelle. still think we could have gotten more for a guy like downie but eh.
Hulu sucks everywhere, not just on PS. Why so many commercials when I'm paying for it already?
I dont know if its true or not, but I have heard everybody has these thoughts. Like standing on a subway platform when the train is coming in, thinking about jumping in front of it. It really is weird stuff.
It doesn't surprise me because of other games that I own where I can view the same thing for them and there always seems to be some early achievement, for a first battle or whatever, that usually only half or less of the people who bought the game got the achievement.  Some have one for even launching the game and still a large percentage don't have them.  I am also guilty of owning lots of games I have yet to play due to sales/impulse buys/backlog and I'm sure this is the same thing for lots of others.
http://i.imgur.com/vwMin.jpg
Can I get it on the Vita first?
God bless your friend
 ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ TOO MANY GOOD LANS 
Yes there is. Buying the discounted candy the next day. Full price? pffft
Again, it is completely reasonable to assume that you were on fast ethernet as the speed in the screenshot is the exact speed you would get with a saturated fast ethernet connection.   Aside from that, I don't want to argue with you any further since you are obviously superior. Enjoy your thread, your highness. 
Most likely for the 500 dollars?
Needs to take some lessons on flopping from CP3.
Requesting an add please. :)
That's not the future...that's still the present. Your clock is just moving faster but you're still in the present.
"So how are you enjoying the party so far?"
Sooo...come here often?
Option to turn off the sound effects in score attack.
There are multiple reasons why I want to, the main one being to elongate the battery life. Also, I love the customization of a rooted phone, I'm bored of all of the launchers out there that you can use with a normal phone, I want to make it so I can do more with it.
underwhelming accomplishment. A large percentage of title teams don't.
There have been countless threads about this. If you want to know what sells then go check your market board. No one is going to tell you what sells or what class makes the most money. That will only cut into their profit
I think Grand Funk's version of Gimme Shelter is much better than the original by The Rolling Stones.
Im I the only here who has Minus gifs load *faster* than imgur?   not only that but plain ole images on imgur seem to take forever to load while other sites dont.  ?_?
She currently has her eye on these: http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B00BGDE0NI/ref=ox_sc_act_title_1?ie=UTF8&amp;psc=1&amp;smid=ATVPDKIKX0DER
Do you think you'd actually do that? What about all the other chodes that think you owe them and actually expect you to pay out because you did it once before?
CRINGE
Gonna need you to add me so we can trade :P
*Heroes* by David Bowie. I love everything the man has ever done, but that song—particularly the latter half—turn me to mush every single time.
I know this goes against the spirit of 50/50, but it's Halloween. I figured you guys deserve a little treat (The treat being no bad option...well, if you're bisexual)
Tears stacked
i mean i dont think anything will ever top kotors story, the walking dead came close for me. but i mean that twist..
I am relaxed. I just find it funny is all xD
I get this all the time. Just, wondering what would happen in if I just leaned in and kissed whoever it is, or ran my fingers through their hair, or stroked their face with the side of my finger, or whatever. And it literally can be anyone. Just wondering how they'd react, and what it would be like.
Thanks! Yig Talismans start going out next week. 
Reminds me of Thumb Wars and the other Thumb parody movies.
Not joking.  I put this up on my wall after seeing it for a good laugh. One of my friends tried it and broke his phone..  I don't know what I was expecting.
ZIDF reporting in
That's what I was thinking too. Thanks!
Who's idea was it to put blue text on magenta background?
There needs to be a much longer version of this. Why did he shoot you? 
I worked at a call center for loans one time.  This one call I took was from a lady from the South.  I advised her to get this loan, the loan's guideline requires a credit score of 620.  She promptly says with deep southern accent " me and my husband combined? "  I could not hold back my laughter.  I had to put her on hold for good 2 minutes.
"Mind if I Slytherin?"
Sounds like a great idea. Posting just so that I don't forget.   A Flying type team would be fun to try. 
I was in Brooklyn a few years ago.
for Vanilla I played Zero/Dante/Deadpool. Then when Ultimate came around I messed with a lot of different teams, and ended up with Zero/Spencer/Vergil.
People who spend over 30 seconds at the ATM.  Also, people who write checks at the grocery store, especially when they don't even put pen to paper until they get their total... YOU ALREADY KNOW WHO THE CHECK IS FOR!!!!
Aw thanks :D
It should be noted that I've upvoted every single person who's disagreed with me here, as far as I know. That said.  In 7th grade, I took an SAT test without preparing for it at all, it was spur-of-the-moment, I knew about it about an hour ahead of time and didn't do any research or anything. I scored higher on it than the average person using it to apply for college in my area. An IQ test has shown me to be in the 99.9th percentile for IQ. This is the highest result the test I was given reaches; anything further and they'd consider it to be within the margin of error for that test.  My mother's boyfriend of 8 years is an aerospace engineer who graduated Virginia Tech. At the age of 15, I understand physics better than him, and I owe very little of it to him, as he would rarely give me a decent explanation of anything, just tell me that my ideas were wrong and become aggravated with me for not quite understanding thermodynamics. He's not particularly successful as an engineer, but I've met lots of other engineers who aren't as good as me at physics, so I'm guessing that's not just a result of him being bad at it. I'm also pretty good at engineering. I don't have a degree, and other than physics I don't have a better understanding of any aspect of engineering than any actual engineer, but I have lots of ingenuity for inventing new things. For example, I independently invented regenerative brakes before finding out what they were, and I was only seven or eight years old when I started inventing wireless electricity solutions (my first idea being to use a powerful infrared laser to transmit energy; admittedly not the best plan).  I have independently thought of basically every branch of philosophy I've come across. Every question of existentialism which I've seen discussed in SMBC or xkcd or Reddit or anywhere else, the thoughts haven't been new to me. Philosophy has pretty much gotten trivial for me; I've considered taking a philosophy course just to see how easy it is.  Psychology, I actually understand better than people with degrees. Unlike engineering, there's no aspect of psychology which I don't have a very good understanding of. I can debunk many of even Sigmund Freud's theories.  I'm a good enough writer that I'm writing a book and so far everybody who's read any of it has said it was really good and plausible to expect to have published. And that's not just, like, me and family members, that counts strangers on the Internet. I've heard zero negative appraisal of it so far; people have critiqued it, but not insulted it.  I don't know if that will suffice as evidence that I'm intelligent. I'm done with it, though, because I'd rather defend my maturity, since it's what you've spent the most time attacking. The following are some examples of my morals and ethical code.  I believe firmly that everybody deserves a future. If we were to capture Hitler at the end of WWII, I would be against executing him. In fact, if we had any way of rehabilitating him and knowing that he wasn't just faking it, I'd even support the concept of letting him go free. This is essentially because I think that whoever you are in the present is a separate entity from who you were in the past and who you are in the future, and while your present self should take responsibility for your past self's actions, it shouldn't be punished for them simply for the sake of punishment, especially if the present self regrets the actions of the past self and feels genuine guilt about them.  I don't believe in judgement of people based on their personal choices as long as those personal choices aren't harming others. I don't have any issue with any type of sexuality whatsoever (short of physically acting out necrophilia, pedophilia, or other acts which have a harmful affect on others - but I don't care what a person's fantasies consist of, as long as they recognize the difference between reality and fiction and can separate them). I don't have any issue with anybody over what type of music they listen to, or clothes they wear, etc. I know that's not really an impressive moral, but it's unfortunately rare; a great many people, especially those my age, are judgmental about these things. I love everyone, even people I hate. I wish my worst enemies good fortune and happiness. Rick Perry is a vile, piece of shit human being, deserving of zero respect, but I wish for him to change for the better and live the best life possible. I wish this for everyone.  I'm pretty much a pacifist. I've taken a broken nose without fighting back or seeking retribution, because the guy stopped punching after that. The only time I'll fight back is if 1) the person attacking me shows no signs of stopping and 2) if I don't attack, I'll come out worse than the other person will if I do. In other words, if fighting someone is going to end up being more harmful to them than just letting them go will be to me, I don't fight back. I've therefore never had a reason to fight back against anyone in anything serious, because my ability to take pain has so far made it so that I'm never in a situation where I'll be worse off after a fight. If I'm not going to get any hospitalizing injuries, I really don't care.  The only exception is if someone is going after my life. Even then, I'll do the minimum amount of harm to them that I possibly can in protecting myself. If someone points a gun at me and I can get out of it without harming them, I'd prefer to do that over killing them. I consider myself a feminist. I don't believe in enforced or uniform gender roles; they may happen naturally, but they should never be coerced into happening unnaturally. As in, the societal pressure for gender roles should really go, even if it'll turn out that the majority of relationships continue operating the same way of their own accord. I treat women with the same outlook I treat men, and never participate in the old Reddit "women are crazy" circlejerk, because there are multiple women out there and each have different personalities just like there are multiple men out there and each with different personalities. I don't think you do much of anything except scare off the awesome women out there by going on and on about the ones who aren't awesome.  That doesn't mean I look for places to victimize women, I just don't believe it's fair to make generalizations such as the one about women acting like everything's OK when it's really not (and that's a particularly harsh example, because all humans do that). I'm kind of tired of citing these examples and I'm guessing you're getting tired of reading them, if you've even made it this far. In closing, the people who know me in real life all respect me, as do a great many people in the Reddit brony community, where I spend most of my time and where I'm pretty known for being helpful around the community. A lot of people in my segment of the community are depressed or going through hard times, and I spend a lot of time giving advice and support to people there. Yesterday someone quoted a case of me doing this in a post asking everyone what their favorite motivational/inspirational quote was, and that comment was second to the top, so I guess other people agreed (though, granted, it was a pretty low-traffic post, only about a dozen competing comments). And, uh, I'm a pretty good moderator.  All that, and I think your behavior in this thread was totally assholish. So what do you think, now that you at least slightly know me? 
Yea "Power of Science"is going to get REALLY OLD really fast 
Same boat here. Also got an hour of power, had to refrain form going out, didn't fancy killing myself on the ergs tomorrow with a hangover..
This is what I have in stock, if you have any other pokemon you're looking for let me know, I can probably breed it:  Shiny Poliwhirl / Shiny Bibarel (2IV)   31/31/31/x/31/31 Adamant Technician Scyther (M/F)   31/0/31/x/31/31 Bold Prankster Klefki (F)   31/x/31/31/31/31 Modest Torrent Squirtle (M) /w Aura Sphere and Dragon Pulse   31/x/31/31/31/31 Modest Rain Dish Squirtle (M) /w Aura Sphere and Dragon Pulse   31/x/31/31/31/31 Bold Regenerator Slowpoke (M)   31/31/31/x/31/31 Timid Infiltrator Noibat /w Switcheroo (F)   31/31/31/x/31/31 Jolly Sand Veil Gible /w Outrage (F)   31/31/31x/31/31 Adamant Vital Spirit Elekid /w Cross Chop, Ice Punch and Fire Punch (M)   31/31/31/x/31/31 Impish Immunity Gligar /w Baton Pass and Agility
I think everyone with a job should do that job to the best of their ability, or they do not deserve to have that job. Plenty people would give their right arm to be in employment right now instead of living hand to mouth on state benefits.
Hope your safe. Of all nights he should know there will be MANY people coming to his door.
added you!
Schrobby its been a pleasure knowing you. [You brave soldier you.](http://i.imgur.com/wwsxLC4.jpg)
Reading this threat, it doesn't seem to happen very often in the US (that they have to pay).
My friends stepdad cheated on my friends mom, and for some reason let me know about it. 
Wait, it says three people are there but it's not displaying them and when I try to connect to a server room it's saying that it can't connect? Maybe it's my computer settings?
Nope.  I'm not losing.  And this isn't an argument.  Just stating facts.
Check out the twitter... https://twitter.com/XboxCanada. They're posting pictures of it opening! https://twitter.com/FS_Gamer is posting updates as well.
i wouldn't agree to give you candy, much less walk up on my porch
There's a difference between cutting education budgets and being against education altogether. Similarly, it's unfair to say that they unanimously do not care even a bit for a newborn baby in poverty.  &gt;Since they believe a person's personality is set upon birth. Criminals are born that way.   This is another unfair generalisation. 
My upvote was for the edit.
What I thought as soon as I read "47 year old woman who quilts"  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mkkP9Bxq_Iw
And the deeper you dig into Appalachian Folk to more you'll find it's roots in Irish/Scot folk music. 
Or just "gmt time".
Thanks for your help.
I don't think it's "everybody is exceptional". I think it's that in the US we generally think that everyone has the capability to achieve at the very least middle class. And for the most part, it's true. Although some people will have a much harder time than others. So, people that are poor are seen as people that just didn't do well enough in school, or didn't do well enough to move up in their jobs or whatever. They got what they earned, which wasn't much. That's kind of the mentality.
4,500, but I still have about 1,500 in unopened Doritos I should really get crackin on 
Trick!
lecturing is something i've considered getting into as well. Are you required by the university to publish academic papers regularly or is it fine to just focus on teaching?
Above 30?  By that point, women have already spent their best years and are no longer as attractive.  If they wait to get married until then, they'll most likely have to settle for someone they aren't very attracted to or end up being a bitter spinster with a lot of cats and alcohol.
It's like when anonymous threatened the cartels. They just said, "OK, we're just going to kill random people until you stop." Queue instant backpedaling.  Sometimes I watch videos on /r/watchpeopledie (NSFL) to see if anything can still shock me and it is always those assholes. Allahu ackbar, yeah whatever, they're just stupid.  I barely even believe in "evil" but some of the cartel videos are why I still do.
Continuing sentences after scene changes. Seriously, does the conversation get put on hold until they relocate and then start up again? The worst offender was Constantine, when John was talking with Dodson about her sister.   Constantine: "How long have you known?"   *Scene change*   Dodson: "Two weeks"
?
Treat
Is there a full recording out there?
it works out fine for me--it's the same speed as the internet on my phone, and i have LTE 4G or whatever.
In that case you need to check out Gymboree too, they have the *cutest* stuff for boys and they have a bunch of fox stuff right now!
lol GO is *more* competitive than source what are you talking about
*sighs* I'm sorry. I just don't like girls... more then a friend at all. *takes a long sip*  OOC: she was hoping Aster would get the hint instead of having to say it outright haha. Guess that's not going to work :P
My mom had a set of those Anchor mugs with the birds on it. My fav one was the one with the Cardinal.
That's a nice rack+jersey phenom right there  
I have a belly button
Really helps me out.
That's so awesome, you have totally come to the right place!  We look forward to seeing more of you in your extensive yoga pants and leggings collection hopefully soon :)
**[disclosure1991](http://para.ms/reus/disclosure1991)**: [^^original ^^reddit ^^link](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/1pm5su/a/cd42vk0/?cd3z1es)  very well put lol. I didnt wanna watch the video so I looked through comments and this sums up the situation very nicely. Fukushima is very serious. I live in the northwest of America and I honestly don't feel safe. I can't even believe people inhabit Japan still. They are in denial and also the ones who are smart and have the means to speak out to large numbers are being kept quiet. If this happened in America (which it very easily could) of course our government would do the same. After Fukushima happened the EPA raised the safe levels of radiation people can be exposed to. So pretty much they will just tell us we are safe and remain calm no matter how many people die. thats pretty much what i think is going on in japan.
Add me please. 2191-7750-2208
╔═════════════════ ೋღ☃ღೋ ════════════════╗ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ Repost this if ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ you are a strong 90's kid ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ who don’t need no Bieber ~ ~ ~ ~ ╚═════════════════ ೋღ☃ღೋ ════════════════╝
Jean de Casse is a badass, and I think is one of my favorite templars from the new game.
I have heard of people using the Rift as a 4th "accessory" display with 3 main monitors in Eyefinity. However, I don't have an Eyefinity setup to confirm this.  I have tested with an Nvidia GTX 690 and was able to do 3x monitors plus the Rift (though it only worked with a very specific set of ports being used on the card).  That said, your laptop would probably be good enough for most of the Rift demos out there. 
&gt; Would there be any case to suggest that if the school is making money off the baked goods, that students should not have to pay an additional "culinary fee" that pays for the ingredients used to make the final sold goods?  Not really.  I mean, if you make that argument, they'll just raise tuition to offset the loss.
You may say this as a joke, but look at the strange souvenir. Does it not resemble the [Barong](http://i.ebayimg.com/00/s/OTAwWDkwMA==/z/X0kAAOxywFlR59n5/$(KGrHqR,!roFHljYCVquBR59n5Nn2Q~~60_1.JPG?set_id=880000500F)? The large eyes, flared nostril, grinning mouth, ornate hat and collar. Barong is the chief God of good in Bali, Indonesia, ie. the protector God.   Really, I do think new region confirmed.
Who are we killing? I'm saying don't have them in the first place - Sweden's genetic passports were a good system, they just went way too far with the requirements. 
Not soccer. More like tap dancing. I've watched her slip around on the ultrasound just to start kicking my bladder...
My first choice is to kill people like you.
Poor llama, he thought he made a friend :(
I'm at 50k with 2 years of undergrad school, and that's with scholarships. even if I'm very lucky ill likely be paying just that much off for the next 30 or 40 years. You can see why I'm willing to risk getting tied up and stuffed into someone's trunk for that. its either that or the military.
replace the word ''frequencies'' with something else and its perfect
Cool idea but I think it would be so abused by crybabies that it would get annoying. 
Sounds hot... in a fucked up way
I think it is sunlight reflecting off the burner, it doesn't quite look like fire. That or OP is an awful person.
Because he has more control over his country.
*bro hug* This happens to me rarely too. I know it's Halloween but for some reason I decided to just stay in and chill tonight. It's not because I think trick or treating is for little kids (I'm 16, turning 17 tomorrow.) Just talk to your friends and explain to them that it's a little rude to make plans and not invite you in front of you. I hope you feel better.
Because the guy from the episode before said that the master wants her back and mentioned the league of shadows I'm going to assume that's where she got her training. She could have been raped at some point or hold some remorse to Oliver for using her 
What i do to get ino games is to go to server browser. No problems at all. :)
Well, if you don't hold down it works exactly like wings.
none of that now
I'm so sorry. Not much consolation, I know, but I am feeling for you.
I'd love a ditto =]
How do you suppose a poor family is able to afford for their child to go to a college or university in this country when the average price for tuition/room &amp; board is over $31,000 a year and rising?  Not to mention student loan debt has now exceeded the $1 Trillion dollar mark.  
Awesome. Thanks!
Okay guys, can someone please tell me who the fuck laurelai is and why he/she is so special? Also, is he/she at all related to the fleet foxes song 'Lorelai'? 
bout as much as I expected from this community.
Thanks
Get this Bulls. 
[The boys do] (http://youtu.be/ocLwRlbn1-E)
Six of one, half a dozen of the other. End result's the same, extermination.
Not sure if they are or if that is even required anymore.  Its also possible the drums auto empty into them since they are on the bottom.
I want revival to to win so we can have an extra game at blizzcon, but I also want Naniwa to qualify... tough choice.
added
On an aeroplane, every damn time, I quash the urge to open the emergency exit door mid flight. And think that I can not be the only one with this thought so always have my seat belt on when sitting. Bad luck if I am waiting for the toilet aye. 
Congratulations, you look fantastic!!!  On top of looking and feeling fantastic, as a female, I gotta say if your ex still sees you around she is with out a doubt SUPER jealous of this sexy version of awesome you. You did it for yourself of course, but it's ok...you can take a little joy in it 
The pope hat. I always imagined how soft it must be.
I...don't know....
[It wasn't on purpose?!](http://i.minus.com/ibwk2AT2y1IeAa.gif)
Well, thats how much kids love haloween
Aah yes! No progress at all would be much better you fucking retard.
Who (in real life) are the most supportive people I know. I don't think it's powerlifting that is his problem.
Title: Cronk  From: st871622@pip.cc.brandeis.edu (not him again) Subject:  RE: CRONK!!! Date: Fri, 8 Jul 1994 22:54:11 GMT  In article &lt;2vffso$imj@bigblue.oit.unc.edu&gt;,  tenney@bme.unc.edu (Charles Tenney) writes:  : Hey, Tae, got any good concussion-cum-intoxication stories?  You know, Charles, I was just gonna post this:  Working the Fourth of July was hell - but at time-and-a-half who cares?  My overnight shift consisted mainly of driving around, drinking coffee, and smoking cigarettes - and chasing after the occasional city punks that shoot bottle-rockets at the ambulance. One rocket actually zipped in one window, and out the other, to explode several yards away. Got me startled, that one. Caused me to spill my HOT coffee on my lap. Bastard got away, too.  Around 2 am, we received a call for an 'MVA - sort of.' The quirkiness of  the dispatcher that night notwithstanding, the call description was rather vague, and our attempts to get an update while enroute were answered with:  "Paramedic 11, the police are on scene - they're screaming for you."  Cops usually scream for you only when they encounter HEAVY trauma, or one of their guys is injured, so we 'stepped it up,' flying down side-streets the wrong way [which, incidentally is a good way to kill homeless people, not that I ever did] and 'sliding' through red traffic lights. We passed by a bar - some of the patrons had spilled out onto the street, and they cheered our passing-by with raised glasses. I saluted them one finger. A few minutes later, we arrived on scene to find our patient.  Apparently, one female Fourth of July reveler had WAY too much to drink. One of her friends, being the kind soul he was [and pretty ripped himself], offered to drive her home. On the way home, she climbed out of the  passenger-side door, and stood on the car window ledge. All was well: she was waving her arm, yelling "Happy Fourth!," - until her friend drove a little too close to a telephone pole, and her forehead caught the end of a lineman's spike. The tip of the spike penetrated the skin on her forehead, but because her head also snapped back at the same time, it _pulled_ her skin back, over her head to about mid-scalp.  When we got to the patient, she was quite agitated, screaming:  "WHAT THE FUCK! I CAN'T FUCKING SEE! HELP ME! I CAN'T FUCKING SEE!"  And so on.  The cops and firefighters looked quite pale - there was a large pool of  blood at this woman's feet. I thought it was the bleeding that obscured her vision. I was wrong. Since she'd basically been scalped, the the tissue that consisted of her nose, cheeks, and mouth no longer had anything  holding it up. So the tissue slid down, moving her eyelids to about cheek- level, blocking her eyes.  I walked up to her, and with gloved hand, grabbed a little lower scalp tissue, and pulled UP. Viola - she could see! I had to be careful, though, since if I pulled up too much, her cheek tissue would move up to eyeball- level, blinding her - and giving her a toothy, feral grin.  After placing a large dressing on her scalp, and instructing her on how to hold her own face up, we strapped onto a wooden board, and transported her to the hospital. No cervical injuries.  At the hospital, her blood alcohol level was .450! Fifty more points, and she qualified for an endotracheal tube. Two surgical residents were called down to suture her scalp closed. It took them three hours and over two  hundred sutures to close her wound. Every so often, she would wake up while they were suturing, and yell:  "Hey - who turned out the lights!"  One resident or the other would lift her face up, she would open her eyes, look around, and fall back asleep.  I don't think they used anesthesia.   ________________________________________________________________________ | Tae-Hyong Kim, NREMT-P, MICT  e-mail: ST871622@pip.cc.brandeis.edu  |  |  Assistant Instructor    Overheard during an autopsy:   | |   Northeastern University   Observer: Did he die of a cardiac arrest?  | |   Paramedic Program Coroner: Well, the baseball bat helped a bit.|
| Are there certain types of Yoga that emphasis one more than the other?  Yes.  | Do Yoga veterans view this as a significant matter?  Yes, but not negatively.   Yoga was developed as and is a method for merging with God or the divine.  We can practice it however we want and believe whatever we want but it does not change this fact. Specific methods lead to specific results.
I didn't take into account her new passive, I must have missed that. Hm.  Actually, this could be a *huge* buff for Soraka. Interesting.
UFO connections mean you either know somebody or know somebody who knows somebody who has a UFO. This is especially useful if you are moving across the galaxy and don't want to rent a U-UFO.  Alien contacts just means you know someone who is an alien.
The French Revolution ended with an emperor, and went back to a monarchy soon after.
You are doing fine.  If you just started a new workout program along with keto the scale can be misleading.  While you are probably not putting on a ton of muscle in one week, you certainly can be carrying extra water in the muscle as they recover from the novel workouts.  My rule of thumb is to weigh myself each Saturday morning upon arising, after peeing.  If I have not made progress in 3 weeks, I then look to adjust things.
Caryn Switaj, @NHLBruins.
I enjoyed it too. Apart from the weird biology (shouldn't all the humans be primates?) it was really entertaining. I love the plots where they come back to the ship and figure out what went wrong. Like that episode with the aliens that used Romulan warp drives to nest their young.
2 months? I give it two weeks.
Every personal and business experience I have ever had with Comcast has gone sour.  They without a doubt have some of the worst customer service in the industry and are white collar criminals so this does not surprise me.  They only make money through monoplozing markets and strong arming customers.
Added
Wouldn't be willing to trade it for a shiny druddigon? Been actively hunting a shiny spritzee
I would have chosen a rounder script for "Press On!", to match the rest of the document.  BTW, Is that a Pentel GFKP, and did you use it for the "Calvin Coolidge" part?
This definitely looks like a connector failure. I'd try to put something several millimeters thick inside the bezel so there would be a constant pressure applied. This is definitely not a permanent fix, but if you can't afford it right now, you may try.
Added, but no ditto sadly, azumarils nice though :)
And people benefit from pleasant smells from just outside a restaurant without paying. Like I said, if that bothers the restaurant owner, they can shut down their business, or if it bothers the restaurant's paying customers, they can stop paying.
I wish I were joking, but this is the nicest thing anyone has ever done for me. You have earned [upvotes for life.](http://i.imgur.com/V0LnEga.png)
But Marge isn't really "hyper-masculine". Honestly, she's pretty much only about as masculine as you have to be to be in the police, ie. being able to look at murder victims without being disturbed and managing to shoot a fleeing man. She's not especially feminine, but she's not really that masculine.
I would do that trade! Been looking for a Lapras, my FC is in flair 
I appreciate you having your opinion.
i pull that chute 
Wipeout 3.  This was my first exposure to the glorious progressive track that is [Xpander](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9Qt1wqS7Hyk) by Sasha.  I have loved trance/house/progressive ever since.
I get home late too, I'll hop on. 
Thanks, I knew I had seen this before but couldn't remember where. 
Come on /u/FuckedThatUpForYou what's going on??
That phrase works well in Archer's voice, in a kind of whisper.   Hear it.   *I know you do that*
Kim is so fucking good at Survivor, life.
Everyone except Madagascar. Fuck those guys. 
May I ask you something? I'm not trying to be racist, I'll just write it down the way I think it is.  I'm living in Germany (an area where many Turks are living). While I really don't enjoy their company, many of them are really friendly and often brighten the mood (yes, we Germans can be very... depressing). Still, many Turks just behave differently than the rest.   Maybe it's just me, maybe it's just that I grew up in a family that had the term "indoor voice". Anyway, I just don't understand how I can react to their temper.   See, I don't know how I should talk to your people. Should I be polite? Because then some of them might try to act like a big king and make fun of me. Should I be rude? That wouldn't be very nice and I don't like that. Or should I be neutral? But what is neutral? I'm just afraid of saying something that might offend anyone and end up being racist.  I might have this fear because some guys here vandalize stuff and just act like total dicks. They show no respect at all. What should I do? I mean, if they were German then I'd probably ask them if they wanna look like "them". But I can't go to a Turk and say "you wanna look like one of those asshole Turks?"  I know that it's the same problem everywhere. Germans act like shit, too (don't get me started about their behavior abroad!). I'm not writing this to criticize or offend you/anyone else. I just need advise. Thanks for reading!
(S?)he was making an anchorman reference, but far too late to garner any support. 
Yes, I've used egg crate foam (not cartons ;) ) to good effect in my work area. Keeps sound from travelling out and keeps unwanted vibrations and reflections to a minimum, which is all I could really ask from such a cheap treatment. I dunno, for me it's good enough; didn't really feel like making it a huge expensive project for something fairly simple.   Puzzled by the downvotes, maybe they think I'm a spammer for that site...  
I think the idea was for Essendon not to benefit from having their points wiped.  
i may have sent you a present
my bet is meth lab fire
I disagree with Roatan being a tourist trap. The only touristy part is the small 'quay' they have developed that looks like a Disney set. The rest is fairly similar to mainland. 
* Dealbreakers: Alabama, Strawberries * Hook: Football * Photos: Best :1st, Worst: 2nd
And yet he was excellent as a Boston semi-lowlife/trouble child in The Departed.  Leo is the shit.  I remember back when he was hated on like Shia Labeouf or Justin Bieber in the Titanic era.
woah, can you stream from an xbox 360 too?
Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reason: You did not include the image's resolution (the width and height in pixels) in the title. You should put the resolution in brackets at the end of your title.  *[I am a bot](/r/PornOverlords/wiki/pornoverlord-info), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FMoviePosterPorn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Well that's.. something.
&gt; If it was still laggy there, then abandon it, because I don't notice any lag at 1-15. But if you didn't try a low setting, I'd try it again.  Even supposedly with no smoothing, it smoothed, and lagged somewhat, even with a pencil tool. I'm sure it's because of the virtual machine, and in Boot Camp (stand-alone Windows) it would be much better, but I hate to reboot the computer just to draw for half an hour. Also, I use a Mac for a reason; it appeals to my sense of design and absence of clutter, which I don't experience in Windows.  This sense of lack of complexity and clutter has even made me abandon the Mac, which I switch on hardly ever anymore. The iPad is so much more friendly and goes out of my way, so I can do what I want, instead of figuring out how to operate the computer.  Going back to Windows for me would be like driving a truck, while I rather drive a bike (iPad), even more than a car (Mac). It's about avoiding friction and not wanting to put up with unnecessary barriers caused by design decisions, put in place almost 30 years ago (1984, launch of the Mac), barriers between you and what you want to accomplish. Old ideas that no longer work. A personal computer is best suited for text input, not so good for other tasks, like drawing.  Steps off his soap box. 
1) Can't argue this.  2) They have yet to serve their debt to society. They've merely been isolated from it in an attempt to recondition them to a state of mind that will make it capable for them to actually serve their debt. Statistical it doesn't work.  3) While this is true, let's focus and your second part of this. If you had a problem with it then you would move. Now you are arguing that people SHOULD be able to look them up, because you wouldn't know if they hadn't told you or if you looked through a felon database of some sort.  4) Not sure if you are damning sex offender registries with this, as it is a direct comparison, or if you were arguing against the idea of felon registries without regard to the fact that the scarlet letter is a poignant parallel to the ostracism that sex offenders receive in society. I would like you to clear that up for me please.
Living End is a totally viable deck, it is my main modern deck and I live playing it. It is surprisingly resilient
It's sad that it's almost dead though
Like? When you provide reliable and reputable facts and evidence and they still disagree it's because they are **definitely** retarded. 
No loss, they didn't protect anything and they fell off easily anyhow. I returned mine the very same day I bought it. 
Please tell me if I can make this with an immersion blender?
Registries are by state.   Speaking only for NJ, you have to actually commit a fairly serious crime to be put on Megan's list. Peeing on a building or being homosexual won't cut it.   http://www.nj.gov/njsp/spoff/megans_law.html
From video: "The developers, I don't know what went through their heads when they designed this sh**t" :D   The answer of course is a lot of alcohol. Originally the idea was that after gaining power in Jan Mayern the Polar bears would try and conquer more islands and re-form the glorious nation of Atlantis. Possibly in some unholy alliance with Cthulhu... but we ran out of vodka.
I'm going to be so pissed if the few Runes I've scrounged together become redundant. Rune grinding is utterly tedious and slow and feels incredibly unrewarding.  Buy a new champion or three Movement Speed Quints?   I have 6 Rune pages (only 4 I actually use) and over two years of playing only have a few standard runes.  It takes AGES to get runes and the fact that you can't change your rune set up during champ select makes the idea of making them more personalised for each champion rather silly.  I *was* planning to play Singed so I had a personalised Rune Page constructed, but he was banned/picked/countered in champ select.  What then?  If Rune pages are more personalised for each champion were just going to need more of them which as I've already pointed out is an arduous process.
It may have a thin atmosphere but gravity is also roughly just below 2/3rd's that found on Earth. Any atmospheric disturbance would allow for such large dust storms to occur and the since it lacks oceans or water in its atmosphere these dust storms tend to last for weeks or in some occasions months.
"I wonder what heroin feels like."  Fuck you, brain. 
My money take it all!
Movies that look like they were filmed with a camcorder, and movies with the shakey camera effects.
*shrugs and drinks more*
I did this is class today when I gripped my pen like a knife because I had dropped it. First thought was to go stab the prof (who is my favorite prof this semester)
Hank was the ultimate independent alpha-male and in an instant he's bedridden and reliant on his wife to wipe his ass and wash him with a rag. It's demeaning. It has nothing to do with her personally he was just mad at his circumstances and he took it out on her.
Nice bikepicts
If you're interested I can offer 2 of these (nonshinies)   * 31/31/31/xx/31/31 Adamant Gale wing Fletchling * 31/xx/31/31/31/31 Timid Infiltrator Noibat * 6IV Hasty Protean Froakie  * 31/xx/31/31/31/31 Modest Litwick * 31/xx/31/31/31/31 Timid Ghasty w/ Disable * 31/31/31/xx/31/31 Adamant Mawile * 31/31/31/xx/31/31 Adamant Tech Scyther
I meet more people on here that live near me than I do at my local coffee shop!  I live in SE PDX.
Amen :) .. 
[](/lyra)Only 100 right now. What've you gotten?
Human stupidity.   Also the beauty of the mountains.
&gt;LICH Y U NO TAEMFIHGT NOOB???
You're using this meme wrong.
Well, I do remember him doing it this year as well. The problem I have with Bevell is it seems like he refuses to switch up his general plan if things aren't working. If he plans a game with a run heavy offense, he sticks with it even if we're getting stuffed. I don't remember the Houston game super well (boozey) but I do remember the feeling that we were trying to stuff it down their throat far too often only to be stuffed. When we started passing a bit in the 4th things opened up for us.   Monday night we were up against one of the worst ranked run D's in the league and one of the best pass rushing duo's with a crumbling O-Line. So what'd we do? Pass, and not even screen passes or slants. If that was Bevell trying to be unpredictable (I *reaaally* hope it wasn't) then the dude should be canned on the spot.
They will charge him as a criminal + 1.  If he has a public defender it's bad, if a reasonably competent lawyer the law will be struck down.
The Avatar is definitely not considered a Buddha, they're viewed on as guardians of peace and balance, and will have to be decisive and take an active role in politics to ensure that the world remains safe at all costs  As for ways of life, could be varied, not to mention that countries with Buddhist traditions have very diverse cultures  The Fire Nation for example is mostly based on Japan, a country with old traditions, many of them rooted in Buddhism, but like real life Japan they have a history of violence and belief of absolute superiority  Mostly the four nations of Avatar have cultures influenced by a multitude of Asian traditions and beliefs, Taoism, Buddhism, Hinduism, Confucianism, the Avatar universe is a melting pot of Asian culture
Catdog  Catdog  Alone in the world is a lil' Catdog
"As I said before, I do not eat much candy. Though I do bake."
what sizes are grey bling and schminx hoodie/tee  and checkered?
Why do parents do this? Why not just wait?
Thats really like 100% if you dont really think about it. 
Yeah, most of them are in Africa though.
That tasted Poro!
I am too dumb to let it ride. It will get me stabbed one day.
I can give you 2 Gaben's  [](#gaben)[](#gaben)
I read that in his voice...
&gt; There is a world outside reddit you know...  Probably not. He appears to be too busy reading scary sounding headlines and defending the indefensible.
Per above comments, couldn't you have at any point before 18 too? Or am I misunderstanding?
I'm just throwing abstract ideas out there. I extremely doubt this will actually happen. Of course in the real world taxation is simply a means of economic exploitation.
No, they're launching OUYA 2.0. Some got OUYA 1.0 and some got OUYA Beta.  Progress through iteration.
[2013 PSP World Cup](http://www.michael-day.net/img/s4/v67/p755028009-3.jpg). I took over 7300 photos and I'm still working through them. I guess that will give me more to submit the rest of this off season.
Love that "fuck me" face at :48
Too many of them, really. Awesome prologue (except Sauron being moron), beautiful Shire in the beginning, Nazgul approach Hobbits on Weathertop, Arwen fleeing Nazgul with Frodo (that shot from high up with all nine of them riding after her is amazing), Fellowship travelling hills and montains while "Ring goes south" is playing, "You shall not pass!", Argonath, Boromir's fight and death (most epic ever), Saruman's speech before his army, entire Helm's Deep battle and Gandalf saving the day, Ents attacking Isengard, Sam's speech at Osgiliath, Rohirrim charge on Pelennor, Faramir's hopeless attack while Denethor is eating and Pippin singing, "For Frodo", Aragorn's coronation, Gray Havens...  Damn, I need to watch the movies again.
For an 11 gallon DIPA you need to double the amount of hops for that hopstand.
dude's missed like 4 marathons in a row due to training injuries. that's what you get for claiming "god" as your "coach".
i love the increased power and fuel economy-the increased safety and reliability. i love the looks and build quality. i love how automakers finally have cheaps cars with nice looking interiors. these are small trade offs for electic throttle, fwd and other minor quirks. 
Eh, but probably [not as much of a predictor as you think](http://www.grantland.com/story/_/id/9441252/bill-barnwell-breaks-2012-numbers-get-feel-2013).
&gt;This weirdly clique, passive-aggressive 'ugh that's not worthy of being here' down voting shit is gay as fuck.  I think the way a lot of people go about it is pretty stupid, but MF is definitely for more experimental shit, and when someone posts a pic of an OCBD with raws and JPs, they need to head over and post in MFA's WAYWT. I won't downvote but I don't blame someone for it. Nothing wrong with the fit, but there's a reason people post here and not in the WAYWT fit- different cultures, different fits are upvoted/not downvoted. If we said not to downvote any of the bizcaz fits I've seen a lot of recently, then wouldn't this just turn into MFA 2.0? MF is here for a reason- for shit that is different than MFA. I'm ok with people downvoting stuff that is to MFA-esque.
Pretty sure you can, just not 8.1 hell you might even be able to do 8.1 on the desktop, I don't see why not.
I have been singing the "Imagination Land" song from South Park except with alliteration for the last five minutes now.
Only thing i could hear in my head was "Arent you a little short for a Stormtrooper?"
For the Mariners, I just want them to start competing for the AL West title again. For my Tokyo Yakult Swallows, I want everybody to get healthy, so we can get our star pitchers back. It would be nice if Wladimir Balentien could hit another 60 HR's or so as well.
*Touché, mon amie* ;)
Are you familiar with the concept of journalistic integrity? Journalists are, by the very definition of journalism, obligated to represent the truth, without bias or alteration. Editing a photo in this way is intentionally misrepresenting an event; this photo did not "actually" happen and is not journalistic.  A lot of people are on here saying "so what? it's just a magazine cover, it's just meant to sell more issues." But it's a slippery slope; a minor violation of journalistic integrity can lead to more drastic violations, misrepresenting information and misguiding the public. It's poor tact and unprofessional.
&gt; Because of this not a single pre-war aim, other than the removal of Saddam, was realized.  The Sunni suicide bombers blowing themselves up every single day had nothing to do with it?
Bam! Silent Hill: Homecoming and Alone in the Dark!
It's built in with some monitors. Since your going with AMD, go with the Asus 248 qe. It's a 144hz monitor with a 1ms response time. It's a very good monitor. Light boost is only for Nvidia, but there is a program to use it with AMD cards.
Her books are the equivalent of brainless hollywood blockbusters. Enjoy them all you want, but don't try to claim Harry Potter they're great literature.
When I'm with my mother, I just think how I could grab a kitchen knife and stab her so easily when she's not looking. Then I think of how horrified I would be of my decision. Not my proudest thought....
I found a cache of things hidden in my old apartment  bathroom,  but it was  just 3 old issues of  "Penthouse Forum" from 1992..
Trick! going with /u/MMAPhreak21 
Is there a live link to what this is actually in regards to? The original Vine thing is down and I didn't spot anything in this thread that was live. 
You must be fun at parties. 
He didn't have any right to get revenge. We have courts for that.
You're still busting a nut on a dude. 
20 points? I would give him the cup for a lifetime.
You're right. He was surprised when I told him that I was okay with it, and now I'm glad that he wasn't interested. I guess I was trusting that I'm the one he wants, but it'd be unrealistic (foolish really) to keep thinking that he wouldn't fall for another.
**[littlegymm](http://para.ms/reus/littlegymm)**: [^^original ^^reddit ^^link](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/1plzl9/a/cd42zl4/?1pm0dp)  I believe this whole dog and pony show is centered around stripping the U.S. of its sovereignty. Just today I'm seeing numerous articles regarding international treaties superseding the constitution. The globalists are using snowden to tarnish the alliances we have with other countries and to strip any remaining obedience or respect the people of U.S. still might have for the government. Probably ties directly into the whole trans-pacific partnership shabang. 
This is very underused advice, thanks for posting. Also pro-tip, when talking on a VoIP phone, be careful not to speak too fast. If you do you might force the packets to move so fast that they bump up and bunch up with the packets in frot of them. They can also create a vortex behind them. And that's how you end up with static on the line and call jitter. 
This is a fucking joke right? Oh god I'm steaming. I need to go calm down.
Offering free contraception and encouraging family planning is evil?
I wish I was feeling you
Secret societies.
RIP Sona.
CIRCLES?! Blasphemy!
This is so exciting!!!!   It can happen any minute, people.
no, I do not, sorry. Although it is highly likely there are kernels of truth in every memory.
Soon
[Here's](http://imgur.com/a90d5hm) my Hall of Fame team too!
I got something I know you want! A SHINY WEEPINBELL! and if that doesn't have you knocked off your seat It'll even be holding a leaf stone!!!
Top Tier being "latest and greatest". If I'm gonna sign a two year contract I want a phone that will be able to hold its own for two years, ya know?
Wow bro...much respect. I never got any during my years of clubbing.
Could not agree more. 
*drag queen party in the highway
If they want fast transport, building near to each other is the solution.
*high fives*. Thanks! 
Do you want to buyt battlefield 4 off me?
Nothing faster than like 55 minutes. I've kind of plateaued, haha. But you're right, once you know it, it's ridiculously easy.
You can read smutt too!
30 round mag for standard fixed mag SKS. You remove the fixed 10 round mag and you can insert this one
Honestly I usually let those sniper picks go, and I am going to take care of the sentry in that situation anyway.  I could always amby him from out of sentry range as well.  The main problem I have with the damn thing is when I do a blind trickstab (I hear someone following me or turning the corner), and he ends up having a razorback and I die to what should have been an easy kill.
best strat :facepalm:
Was it your fault?
Cooking something for 1 minute in the microwave. To short to walk away, to long stand around waiting.
I think that the 2nd one is very specific which is why I probably would prefer the 1st one more. 
AP Pistol is even better than Carbine within short ranges. In medium ranges, the results are more equal. Try out the AP Pistol in your next survival match.
I am honestly ashamed of so many posts continuing to consider the parents guilty beyond any doubt.  Typical guilty until proven innocent mentality. And truth is that many Portuguese go with this story, instead of noting how shitty the whole police and justice system is in Portugal.  The Portuguese justice system and police system just does not work.
it is. is there something i should know about them?
As a previous recipient, I can say that the blueberry muffin is pretty damn good.  EDIT: Ignore my comment as an entry. 
[Here's a picture](http://imgur.com/QWGFEuF). It's not either of the problems that /u/cousinroman mentioned, but pretty straightforward. The socket is turned upside-down so that the pins in the centre fit into the holes in the board. I've marked the leads that should attach to each other. The surface mounting may make it harder, I'm not sure.  There are three cymbals. I also have a wireless keyboard that almost exactly the same thing happened too (a surface-mounted component came off), if you could do that as well, it would be great.  Of course I wouldn't expect you to do it for free. I guess the amount would depend on how complex it turns out to be, but I would want to be fair.
Added!
Open your driveway/yard up to parking and charge $15 or $20 for each car.  If they're desperate you'll make some extra money :0)
Reducing the entropy in a closed system.
Also there is a beginners guide to them in the sidebar at /r/trapmuzik.
Am I the only one here thinking about Bruce Willis in Pulp Fiction?
FUCK COMCAST. They promised 10MBps and I'm getting ~2.5MBps. Terrible customer service, shit pricing.
Silver Hand Knight - His butthole acts as a tardis for which his Squire waits ready for battle, sat betwixt the poops of his hero, waiting for his chance to act as cannon fodder.    And all for 5 mana. 
I like his eyes
What makes it so busy? Halloween parties? I never associated pizza and Halloween. 
thinks shes good at being on top, hahaha, thats a joke.
Well, I got Oblivion for free as part of the same Gamestop deal I got Skyrim with, buy 3 games, get the cheapest one free. It was for the xbox, though. I don't own it on PC, and don't really want it either.
Got a white 32GB. Paid the extra bit of coin to upgrade the shipping to hopefully get it here quicker. HURRY GOOGLE. Praise #holo
Thanks! I'm stoked to see how they ski!
ITT: Using low deficit and healthy economy interchangeably 
I get the feeling he discovered that word and crafted that post around it just to use it
Last I checked OMAP wasn't around for 4.3, and that didn't stop Google.
GOIN' OFF THE RAILS ON A STACY TRAIN
as a legacy player...  gitaxian probe
Whenever I hear other people saying the things I think I have to wonder if that makes me feel good or bad! Now when I think about this on my way to work I'll know that all around me cars are filled with strangers thinking, a week in the hospital. It'd be a change and my friend would probably come visit! 
Nothing I currently own cost me more than a thousand bucks, but value wise I have an original 98%+ condition Ithaca 1911A1, a few nice Garands and a handed down S&amp;W 1917.
K, as cool as that whale is, this is my worst nightmare to see this with a shark.
the absurdity of it all
I'll make sure to post the full goatee when it's time to check in, in December. Or a ferret taped to my face whichever's easier.
I usually get a lot of comments on the shotgun pics, as one of them is on my business card. One day a woman at the grocery store was asking about my shirt and I happened to have these other pics on my phone. While I was trying to show her the designs she said "are those airsoft?" lol  Anyway i never posted to the guns forum before, just wanted to show off a few of the collection (seriously not trying to push an ad, but I love these pics) and go browse around a bit while I write me screenplay for the concealed carry vid I want to do. Thanks for lookin!
I feel so... warm... so FUZZZY 
For me, (I throw on a really good throw about 350') they actually make no noticeable difference on the underside.  Tape them to a clear(ish) disc, facing upwards.   It literally makes the disc much much much easier to find at night than during regular day play.  It's like a beacon taking you straight to your disc.  Absolutely love it.
Yeah, car wrecks can be...interesting.  I saw a nun get cut in half once. 
Are the panels going to be streamed or recorded?!? I must know what is going to happen since I can't go :3
You fucking murderer!
and to think with all that advancement, we're still just like the zombies of the universe.  Its possible that we are using a tiny percentage of our max capacity. Sorta like zombies to a human. We seek sustenance all the time. We aimlessly wonder around our planet without a common goal as a species. We have goals as countries, which is close.  Its possible that something/someone else has already found us (maybe other humans, but much further along the tech tree) and they decided its better to stay in an observant role, like how we would observe animals in nature without interrupting what they do.   Imagine all the advancement we've achieved the last 100 years. Now add 100 more, then 1,000 more, then 1,000,000 more years. We're only 10,000 years old as a species. We know so little :'(
Yay another PC gamer! (: I just started getting into comics and it is so exciting haha what are your favorite so far?
Now if we could just add on some more goals here, that'd be really nice. I want us to get a blowout victory so so bad. 
By throwback i meant the song took me back and reminded me of the early 2000's.
Anything with heels makes me a happy man!
I'm guessing that the people who are making a fuss about boycotting Chick-fil-a and the people who can't afford to replace a $3 sandwich are probably different populations.
Yeah, I would know if I was required to goto the courthouse
*pulls away knowing you don't want my touch* I'm so sorry Devon 
No i understand about the black guy thing. That isn't surprising. I have plenty of relatives in eastern rural Iowa. There isn't as much of this southern stuff going on as you described. I'm just really surprised at all. I am aware that the areas I was in were different, but I think just your location is different than the rest of iowa. I suppose Western Iowa though can be just as bad.
Why? 
I really do believe he is going to be utterly brilliant for us. He's a competitor, he ran the show for River plate as an 18 year old against Boca Juniors. He has the most natural ability out of anyone in our team.  Give him time, let him get comfortable with his surroundings and team mates and the performances will flourish. 
hehe down vote them!
I've just started to.  Luckily the bump grows slowly, but today I decided it was time to use a new parking space at work.  My assigned space was too narrow so yesterday I could barely get out of my car.  Today, I used one with an empty space next to it so I could properly open the door.
Not so much a pun as it is litteral... 
What weapon are you using? For the horizontal laser swipe- he only does it after he's underground and then comes halfway up, leaving his hind legs and tail underground. If you seem him half up like that, he's going to do the horizontal laser, which is your sign to get right up next to him. If you're standing right next to him the laser will go over you and you can spend that whole time whacking him uninterrupted.  As for the straight laser, just try to never be right in front of him. I prefer to attack from the side or behind, but as a gunlance, I never have to worry about dodging hip checks. Depending on your weapon, you might have to find different areas where you're comfortable getting free hits in.
I'd say that's a pretty accurate assessment - not being able to eat due to the selfishness of others can have a tendency to be taken rather personally.  Thanks for the tip - I'll check those out.
I'm disappointed for the Plaintiffs' attorneys, both of whom I know fairly well. They put in an incredible amount of time and I'm sure they were already operating at a loss, based on the trial-level result.
But there's nothing there. 
I throughly enjoyed attempting to collect all of the hooks in morrowind. (I never came close) 
Now see, to me, it isn't any worse when it happens to the Pope.
Have you read Blindsight? It's modern, it's near future, it's space-related, it's absolutely brilliant, and it's free.
If only the wind blew at optimum speeds all the time.....
I'm still concerned that Alterzim is a little too big, but we'll see.  I haven't played that many games on it yet.  I'm really glad to see Star Station back.  Interesting that they didn't really listen to the mostly negative feedback about Polar Night though.  It seems like a lot of pros don't like it.  Oh well, I'm excited nonetheless.  I think we need more map shake ups more often!
[citation needed]
Nothing creepy about that...
[**@LiquidTaeJa**](https://twitter.com/LiquidTaeJa): &gt;[2013-10-31 23:59:13 UTC](https://twitter.com/LiquidTaeJa/status/396063842725154816)  &gt;[@NaNiwaSC2](https://twitter.com/NaNiwaSC2) hi^^  ----  [^[Mistake?]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=TweetPoster&amp;subject=Error%20Report&amp;message=http://reddit.com/1pnknk%0A%0APlease leave above link unaltered.) [^[Suggestion]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=TweetPoster&amp;subject=Suggestion) [^[FAQ]](http://www.reddit.com/r/TweetPoster/comments/13relk/) [^[Code]](https://github.com/buttscicles/TweetPoster) [^[Issues]](https://github.com/buttscicles/TweetPoster/issues)
Would love to add you. Thanks. :)
like a tomb   man
Hey, how come he supports shariah law, is still a believer, yet he has a non-muslim girlfriend? By having premarital relationships, hasn't he already stepped into the world of the kuffar, and become one of us? Or does he not understand how bad of a sin it is in the eyes of Islam? fornicators would be flogged/exiled/cut off from society. Sorry, I'm not trying to be judgmental or offensive, just curious. 
I think the point trying to be made is that you look like you're wearing skin. Which is weird.
This thread is just too easy for you. ^Damn ^it. 
k im on now as well.
It's funny that you say that when the US government is the largest economy in the world, and is the single most powerful entity in the world. 
The thing is some champions get countered harder by CC than others for example melee ad carries vs ranged ad carries or DPS vs Burst champions. Melee carrys and DPS champions in general are weaker vs CC than ranged carrys and burst champions. I agree with your main point though it is stupid to list cc as a counter to every champ. But it is fair to say that for example Katarina gets countered by CC quite hard. 
Maybe things would change if he got a buzz-cut.
Spiders
Keys still get hot to touch though. 
Pro gun here. This guy is a moron, plain and simple. Really not a partisan issue. 
WTF ?!?
So 64% of Americans believe crime is up.
I thought French referred their country as motherland - so shouldn't the genders be switched?
Antarctica too?
What is the nature?
Not necessarily. *Brand* is what matters. If you're able to have a high-volume low-margins business, it matters more than profit. You can alter prices or cut costs all day, but none of that matters if you don't have the volume already.
You can also use it as anti-freeze for the winter. For the winter... is coming.
I love it when old people do that squinty thing with their receipt, just trying to find something to complain about. At my old job we had them ask about every little price, hoping we'd messed up. Finally, they'd huffily take their trays and leave, angry we hadn't made a mistake.
Why would a business buy something just so that they can sell the same thing at a cheaper price?
Boba Tea... Seriously, so dumb and pretentious and weird and gross and... absolutely delicious...
http://www.nationalaffairs.com/doclib/20080827_kass.pdf
I'm really fucking hoping this is satire.
There can be terrible managers that do terrible things anywhere.  Being responsible for the code you write is still an invaluable lesson.
What he said. 
Plus,  if someone is in a state run facility already and it was a nonviolent but possibly intentional grope...fuck is going to happen to them?  If you're already commited for life being on that list means jack shit
It was nice knowing you. 
Your submission has been automatically removed because it does not contain one of the required tags.  We have updated our system, and now require a new tagging procedure. Please review the subreddit rules [[Located Here]](http://www.reddit.com/r/pokemontrades/wiki/rules/) and use proper formatting.  If you delete this post and re-submit using the correct format, and provided you meet the posting criteria, your post will automatically be approved.  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fpokemontrades) if you have any questions or concerns.*
If I were a sex offender I think I'd be likely to just say fuck-it and either move out of country or just go on a murder-suicide rampage, leaving a clear note indicating that it was the continued treatment I'd recieved by society that caused me to carry out my actions. But realistically, I'd just leave the country.  
Thank you for your answer. That seems the best way :)
Wtf!?
I was so happy when I saw this, thought I just found the greatest recipe ever...now I have to keep checking back to see if someone comments with a recipe cus its a great idea
Good info again! I might need to remove my "shell" and the weights to see if I can get used to it or even like it. Thank you again!
\#TakeOverTheOmniverse
That's all so far!
Looks like Frisco
Are there laws here against it? Not sure if trolling or serious...
Eating meat is not intrinsically unethical. But is it ethical to end the life of another when it is not necessary for one's own survival? I sometimes hear people argue that meat is "okay" if it's wild game that's been properly hunted because there was no suffering. Does a lack of suffering make killing animals okay?
"I like shorts! They're comfy and easy to wear!"
I guess any classroom really, as I would expect different branches and different nations to have their own way of doing things while different service men and women to be learning their own things based on their career choices. So it's ultimately about the casual things but also about the unique stuff that you may have experienced but others may not have.  Things that separate what men and women experience than screaming Drill Instructors that are common in film.
Not sure why people are downvoting you for answering the question exactly as the OP asked for it, but I figure it is because your ten year-old knows that John Cena is boring, and that Sandow should be the champion. You have a smart kid on your hands there.
No lol I'm watching South Park with my girlfriend.  She wants to watch a scary movie.  What do I say?
I fucking hate comcast. I can't wait till their greed catches up with them and google makes them obselete. Go to hell comcast! As I use you daily.... (sigh)
Pretty much, so paranoid about fixing a potential issue they are affecting the way their actual customers view them. 
The article linked is evidence and also common sense. Do you honestly believe that one day society decided that boys will like trucks and girls will like dolls and since then there has been a huge conspiracy to convince kids that this is true?
It's funny until it ends up hitting something you own. 
I think the m50 thrusters is wrong, it doesn't match up to the 8 tr2 it states directly below and is identical to what the 300i had, I feel like its a typo
A morality based upon perfect rationality expects it but doesn't damn you for not being perfectly rational all the time. It's a constant end to be striving towards. The only evil is to ignore the cultivation of that faculty or to willingly disregard your capacity to be reasonable.   &gt;No matter how much I think people should be rational, they're going to remain irrational, and if I want to get anything done, I need to anticipate that.  That's what a man being an expert over himself has to do with it. You start off assuming that someone won't be reasonable and treat them as such, rather than assuming that they should and can be reasonable and treat them as such. Treating them with *dignity*, which brings me to my next point...  Dignity does not vary wildly in that it is a term that denotes an inherent respect for the dignified agent. You should respect your fellow man enough to give him the benefit of the doubt that he will appeal to reason in your dealings. That doesn't mean you blind yourself to the reality that not all men will be reasonable--but you should treat your fellow man with the same dignity and respect you would demand from him towards yourself--and if you're reasonable enough to go making claims like this that have any value, and we're to take you as a respectable dignified rational agent, why is it that you start off presuming someone else is not similarly so?
Sounds easily abuse-able with energy shield and a bloodmagic gem.
I'm particularly interested in the battery reviews. My galaxy nexus battery is complete and total shit. 
Magic also has a good about of more mechanics. First strike, double strike , all that jazz.   HearthStone is still new. I hope it evolves just as well. 
You're pretty enough to risk it!
Because they still want to trade with us, and blackmail in regards to trade is likely if they step on our toes too much.
Good to know, thank you very much!
To be fair, when i pay for fast food i dont wash my hands before eating.(dont think many do)
Where was this taken? Cuz it looks scarily familiar...
I agree with you a lot more than him. He made mistakes, but I've never seen a d-man who doesn't. The vast majority of the time he is solid.
I just discovered Dad Jokes so maybe this will help  http://www.reddit.com/r/dadjokes
ah, got it! thought you were meaning one of the major parties and ideologically that doesn't work for either
Here are the questions, sorry i must have messed up something with the link:  I'm doing a questionnaire for my kitchen supervision class and need to put together some statistics on a couple different subjects. Please answer honestly *What motivates you to come into work every day? (pay, getting experience, seeing happy customers, etc...) *What are some problems that often go unnoticed in kitchens that you've worked in? (sanitation problems, food waste, bad communication between front/back of house...) *In regard to the last question, what are some ways that you could be persuaded to help the staff correct these problems (compensation in cash or gift cards, free food, days off...) Thanks for any help you all are willing to offer!
I fondly remember reading these with my grandfather at their cabin in the north woods of Wisconsin.  I must have been about 6 and I was so profoundly terrified of these books, particularly the pictures, I was afraid to open them alone.  Many of these I vividly remember, and I think the stories and pictures in this book are the basis for basically all of my irrational fears.  That and the Exorcist.  It SUCKS they redid the artwork.  The new stuff is so generic and doesn't evoke much of anything.  Modern society man.  I'm glad I got to grow up when I did.
This is a stupid argument. Its like saying we should legalize murder because "murderers dont care about the law, they'll just murder anyway". The point of the law is that it *adds penalties* to people who have been found in violation. How is that so hard to understand? If not every murderer gets caught should we just accept murder as legal?
If it worked with platforms it'd be awesome cause I could actually go through it instead of going around the block. It feels way less decorative that way. :/
I understand that their families and friends are being killed on accident, something I have never experienced, however I think the anti-drone folks want solutions that simply will not happen.  It seems that people forget the alternative to drones is the Pakistani army using rolling artillery barrages to cleanse the country side.  I'm not really for or against drones, I just think it's important to understand that not using drones seems to not be option, and the alternative is far worse.
You may get lucky if your 100% not at fault. Its not the insurance companies job to police or do anything if you are not liable for any of the damage costs or injury. The problem will arise if you are deemed to be at fault and at what %. Get insurance silly, no reason not to have basic liability.
It is better for the pumpkin miner to have forgotten those nasty skills, in the long run. He will be much happier.
Usually I'm not against reposts but man, it was [posted](http://www.reddit.com/r/touhou/comments/1pmzgg/touhou_mmdthis_is_halloween_the_nightmare_before/) just 4 hours ago.
DAE le Dickard Dorkins is my lord and saviour
That's a good answer.  But it basically means that whether you do it or not miracles don't really exist.  God will never intervene on your behalf.  Everything should happen, will happen.  And every single little starving African child can pray until his lips are numb, but God will never save him.
That's a pretty tough sell but it would be exactly what you need. My point is more that I don't see that type of deal happening and your WR3 is really troubling if Hopkins doesn't turn it around. 
The real Heisenberg, not that shitty poser that's doing the rounds. 
What is wrong with you? Waltzing in here with your delicious looking bacon and cheddar delights and YOU DON'T EVEN LEAVE A RECIPE! You should be ashamed of yourself! 
Bloody Catholics.
Really, Expelled for a video that nobody is going to see?  What is this, high school? I thought universities represented maturity, let adults make their own choices (even if it means making a shitty video)
Actually...okay, funny story.  Absolutely smoking blonde bartender at a karaoke bar downtown.  Objective 8 for sure, 9 to many.  Well, the second or third time I was in there, we were chatting - I'd pulled her up on stage for a duet earlier in the night - and she began professing her love of anime.  Well, in my younger days, I was quite the *otaku* myself.  So we talked for a while, and she kept leaning in, playing with her hair, reaching out to touch me - all great body language, obviously.  Long story sort, she practically threw her phone number at me.  And here's the sucky part: I couldn't do anything about it.  Her husband of *less than a year* is a bouncer at the same bar.  **And he was working that night.**  If I'd taken her home, there would be absolutely no way for me to ever set foot in that bar again.  Ultimate cockblock, right there.  TL;DR: I chose my favorite karaoke spot over the chance to score with one of the hottest blondes I've met.
Why are you only eating one piece of sushi at a time? 
Hahaha. People that milk the system purposely isn't an example of greed? I'm not disagreeing with you on the initial post. I'm saying people in general are greedy. It's a sad place to be in. Sure corporations can be fucked up. Employees can definitely be too. Employees just don't realize how many resources there are to gain a stronger leverage. My life is pretty awesome by the way. Had throw that out there.  Edit: Sure I'm not the most articulate person at times. Hell, even have typos in my writing. Being a person that lives 3 blocks from the beach in sunny CA, went from Costco, being a prince at Disney, becoming a bar tender in the city of LA, and finding my life as a yoga instructor with some of the biggest names, traveling the world... Yeah life sucks. Oh yeah, just got married to my beautiful husband on Oct 1st.
Without a doubt, The Legend of Zelda: Majora's Mask! Ocarina of Time was obviously a classic soundtrack, but Majora's Mask's music, like the game itself, was more melancholy, darker, more disturbing - more memorable in a lot of ways. Especially all the variations of this song: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JHgZm7Z_wL4
Ok, I think I can figure it out from here.   You earned that gold !   One last thing , can you add an open source license to your project .  
yeah, mod post a week or two back.
Sorry /= would you be intrested in pudge? I have him and gunna be kicking him out soon
I would start with an easier song. You are getting some of the distances (between notes) correct, and you are close most of the time, but I would suggest looking for a more repetitive song, where the lines are pretty straightforward.  As has already been said, matching pitch is your first big step.  A piano or keyboard is invaluable at this time in your singing development.  Once you are matching pitch and can sing a capella, all the work is REALLY REALLY rewarding, so keep it up.  BTW, you have good taste in music for picking this piece, but it's not your speed just yet.
You found the postmodernist secret mode!
There's nothing hypocritical about what I said. I never said I could do a better job as mayor. In fact I don't think I should be mayor, and that has nothing to do with how much weed I smoke. My issue with Ford being the mayor of Toronto isn't really related to drug laws in any sense, for what it's worth I think marijuana should be at the very least decriminalized, if not legalized and regulated in the same manner as alcohol and tobacco. Again though, that's beyond the point.  &gt;I'm not washing my hands of Ford because he smoked crack. I'm washing my hands of him because he got caught in a lie.  At the end of the day I think it all goes back to the type of character you're asked to put your trust and faith in. And the issue isn't specific to the fact that he smoked crack. If it was meth he was smoking, I'd feel the same way. If he was running an underground pitbull fighting league, I'd feel the same way. If he was cheating on his wife, I'd feel the same way.  It's a basic principle that beyond paramedics, doctors, police, and firefighters, the mayor might be the single most important job in the entire city of Toronto. The person making those decisions effect my everyday life, and those decisions have ramifications on future generations. Is it too much to ask of that person to be completely infallible? Is it too much to expect that person to have a impeccable character? Is is too much to take pride in and have respect for the type of character that happens to be the prime representative of our city?  Edit: I also simply do not believe you about this not effecting his job performance. Do you honestly believe that after waking up to 35 reporters on his front lawn, and the Toronto police holding a 20 minute press conference covered live by about 5 different news channels, he just went about his day and put full focus into his duties as mayor?
This is really what's important. That one area (Hawks Nest) - at least for the Sounders - typically has the most resale on StubHub of any area. It's almost predictable. Not at all surprised that they're looking to fill it...especially since what it looks like on TV if it's not.   I will presume they'll slowly open up the stadium based on how sales go. They're definitely moving decently from what I hear anecdotally, but we shall see!
You can't change post titles and it doesn't really give anything away.
It's the Dessert Appetiser... kind of like a side dish that you eat before you get a slice of pumpkin pie.
Three in the Premier League.  Crystal Palace (A), Swansea (H) and Hull (H).  We also beat Hull in a shootout in the LC yesterday.   In fairness, the couple of seasons before we *were* pretty unfairly deprived of quite a few penalties. 
Damn I knew that deal seemed sketchy
I'm moving out of my moms house in saskatchewan and moving to Calgary in a couple of weeks, first time being independent, I would also like to know.
I wouldn't have minded as much if he came clean and sought help. The problem is that he lied about it, tried to cover it up and tried to get the evidence himself. 
Heretic! You must believe that its 4 or you go straight to ∞/0.
I think he meant a 5 in the looks category.
You should see the whole map! A few branches which people have explored, and so many random things.
It's called karma. OP wanted the karma 
Any wings?
On my way!
Work used to mean force exerted through a distance. Now it means show up.
*...feeling it.*
Ah ha.
comrade kessel would approve
In some areas of the world FIFA might be bigger, but League of Legends is played in Asia (China) too, where there are simply way more people.
Thanks for posting this! I've been looking for it all day and couldn't find a link for the life of me.  edit: Yung Simmie is mad underrated, can't wait for that Basement Musik 2.
Dat reddit genius.
I don't mind playing with babies/children, but when it comes to cleaning them or feeding them, I'm out. If I ever have one, I'm getting a nanny.
When you're at a place and surrounded by people much better looking than you (which is everywhere I go) I become invisible. A day like Halloween is a perfect holiday to me because I can blend in. But then later I become invisible again. Do you know what it's like to be ostracized?
So did I. I thought the NFC south was going to be the best division in all of footbal by a considerable margin at the beginning of the year, because I could see any of the 4 teams making into the playoffs   And then Falcons and the Bucs got into a competition of who could shit the bed harder
Actually it was a little more the other way around.  Sexy France was tieing up Sexy America, then Sexy Britain beat up Sexy France but decided Sexy America looked better tied up. Then Sexy France helped Sexy America beat up Sexy Britain [I have to laugh a little each time I type 'Sexy Britain'].  Sexy France went home and Sexy France's Sexy Maid untied herself and, uh, cut off Sexy France's head. Then Sexy Napoleon conquered the rest of Sexy Europe, while Sexy America tried to tie up Sexy Canada.  It was a sexy clusterfuck.
&gt; Afterlives are our brain's method of staying sane when thinking about death. That doesn't mean that an afterlife exists, it means it is a coping mechanism, a denial of the truth of reality which we cannot truly think about.  I think about it without going insane; who the fuck are you to tell me I don't? When I'm dead, the closest thing to an afterlife there will be is whatever I leave behind on this world, family, friends, whatever. If you're claiming that I believe (on *any* level) in anything beyond that, that is flat-out incorrect. Just factually wrong.
[This](http://www.shortsbrewing.com/beers/pistachio-cream-ale/) is the first thing I'm finding.  Probably a long shot.
I think by "volume" he meant "volume of business." If i am the producer of 50% of the product in my region, i have great volume. It doesn't mean literal weight or liters.
Well, it's my personal experience. I seem to win vs Talons, Zeds and Pantheons (well, being 50 creeps behind but 3-4 kills from ganking make up for it I guess) but holy shit, I hate that fish.
Ooo…cool. Update with Noivern pics! Congrats, by the way. In excited about shinies right now since I caught my second ever yesterday. 
Yes. When you are at diamond, everything starts to matter a little more, no doubt. I'm just trying to dispel the notion that macro is more important to develop than everything else. Learning Parting's immortal all in is easier than learning rain's PvZ style. Your gonna tank your mmr before you get the hang of it. On ladder, 1 tight build with decent ffs will get you to diamond.  When mc was teaching his Gf how to sc2, he made her play blink stalker micro custom games 50% of the time... For beginners, I don't see why not.
ok for some reason this gif is really freaking me out. something about those fingers...
As a Patriots fan...god damn it, those wounds still hurt.
Well they haven't needed it so far.
Let's fuck this shit up.
This is definitely the way forward in making studying fun. I think I like what I see. 
Yeah nows fine, what's your IGN? Mines Joseph
I'm not here to say why I think things are this way, but I've noticed that there is sometimes a difference in how christianity is preached between churches. I was raised in Black American churches and now that I'm in college the majority of churches I find have a predominately Caucasian audience.   I've noticed that in Black churches salvation and the suffering of believers is emphasized. Slavery is a big theme in these churches and suffering and salvation from it tend to be a big preaching point. While faith in God is huge, I've noticed it's usually faith through the suffering and praise in the salvation.  In primarily Caucasian churches I've noticed that Grace through Faith is emphasized. I hear about forgiveness and grace through suffering and salvation and evangelism in salvation.  Personally I think it's just two cultural aspects to the same message. If I had to say why they're different I'd would probably attribute it to the separation in standard of livings between the two races. People who have harder lives may want a message that they can relate to... the Hebrews and Job. While people who have been privileged with easier lives want  to hear about spreading their good fortune and make themselves more worthy and relate to Paul.
http://www.amazon.com/Native-Instruments-Maschine-Groove-Production/dp/B00940THOW/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1383264029&amp;sr=8-1&amp;keywords=white+maschine  the person in the photo has a black machine with white faceplate
What the fuck goes through the minds of people like you.  
Very smart. Thanks for providing a different outlook on how to run a business. It should keep me around a little bit longer I hope.
My favourite is one of the rare non-lethal Grimtooth traps.  Walking along a corridor and a pit opens up dropping one party member inside. Grate immediately closes and the pit begins to fill with water. Let them panic for a little bit, try some ideas. Then, just as the water is about to go over their head, the water drains away, the grate opens and a ladder slots out from the wall. Then a sign drops from the ceiling, written on it is: "The next one will be lethal. Go home."
Cool. I've seen the crowes like 8 times, most recently October 4th in Starkville MS..
I have all female cousins that are my same age growing up I saw them as just friends but when I turned 17 I got really into one in particular, the issue sorted itself out.
This is only for dead rising 3 forma 5 and ryse.   **you will not get a pre order bonus for any other games**
Tell your Mom she did a great job!  I just wish the "real" lids were are good as the one she made! ;)  
I imagine the team saying okay like rammus.
There are casinos!!! I played the game for 3 years and I didnt know this
*He turns back, crouching near Amser.*  "Hey, it was just a mistake. We're just a bit anxious is all. We'll find him, but probably not too easily..."
Are you okay, Rhianna?  She was struck down. It was her doom.
Yeah sorry I was cleaning up dinner! Adding you now
exactly!
Like what /u/Honda1616 said Power Supply tends to be the first thing that fails, 2 years is a pretty decent lifespan for one. I've had them act just like how you describe when they die.   Just to be thorough, take a close look at the capacitors on your motherboard. Look for any that could be puffed out on the silver tops, or spilling their guts all over. If that revels nothing, try disconnecting unnecessary devices like your CD-ROM and external hard drives that might be powered off of your computer.
At one point BTC was $19 cheaper at CampBX.
Ok, fine.  It was Laurence of Arabia.
If you walk right up against the door and rotate the camera around you can see that inside there is a small section of cave that ends a couple metres after the door.
WANT! NOW!
trick
Hey Greg, I added You FC in flair =) I'll let you know your type
Also, no snacks.  I hate the crumbs!
http://img.gawkerassets.com/img/18s8t74s2yz5ygif/original.gif
Same.  Just to see the reaction on their face.
There is some evidence that modern wheat is more troublesome than its pre 60s forms, but gmo isnt harmful.
Marijuana AND gigabit fiber?  Why don't you save some for the rest of us!
Because he didn't press charges they decided to let her stay?  Bull shit.  There was no excuse for allowing her to stay.
*smiles and hugs back*
Do you know him personally or do you like how  he reads from   a script?
 This link appears to have been removed from /r/politics by either the spam filter or moderators.  ---  [Even in Canada the health system fails mental health patients and their families. How can we stop things like this from happening? [The Boy Who Killed His Mother - Schizophrenia Documentary]](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1pngjz/even_in_canada_the_health_system_fails_mental/)  submitted 52 minutes ago by: [ChainOfTitle](/user/ChainOfTitle) to [politics](/r/politics)  ---  **[Confirm it's missing](/r/politics/search?q="Even%20in%20Canada%20the%20health%20system%20fails%20mental%20health%20patients%20and%20their%20families.%20How%20can%20we%20stop%20things%20like%20this%20from%20happening%3F%20%5BThe%20Boy%20Who%20Killed%20His%20Mother%20-%20Schizophrenia%20Documentary%5D"&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)** | **[Message the moderators about this removal](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Spam%20filtered%20in%20/r/politics%20%3A%20Even%20in%20Canada%20the%20health%20system%20fails%20mental%20health%20patients%20and%20their%20families.%20How%20can%20we%20stop%20things%20like%20this%20from%20happening%3F%20%5BThe%20Boy%20Who%20Killed%20His%20Mother%20-%20Schizophrenia%20Documentary%5D&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1pngjz/even_in_canada_the_health_system_fails_mental/)** | **[Post to PoliticalModeration](/r/PoliticalModeration/submit?title=/r/politics%20%5Bspam%20filtered%5D%20Even%20in%20Canada%20the%20health%20system%20fails%20mental%20health%20patients%20and%20their%20families.%20How%20can%20we%20stop%20things%20like%20this%20from%20happening%3F%20%5BThe%20Boy%20Who%20Killed%20His%20Mother%20-%20Schizophrenia%20Documentary%5D&amp;url=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1pngjz/even_in_canada_the_health_system_fails_mental/)**   |     |  | |     |  | ------------|-----|-|-----------|-----| created: |  Oct. 31, 2013 11:07 p.m. | |score:  |  1 | first seen: |  Oct. 31, 2013 11:51 p.m. | |upvotes:   |  1 | last seen:  |  [[LIKELY SPAM FILTERED]](/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Spam%20filtered%20in%20/r/politics%20%3A%20Even%20in%20Canada%20the%20health%20system%20fails%20mental%20health%20patients%20and%20their%20families.%20How%20can%20we%20stop%20things%20like%20this%20from%20happening%3F%20%5BThe%20Boy%20Who%20Killed%20His%20Mother%20-%20Schizophrenia%20Documentary%5D&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1pngjz/even_in_canada_the_health_system_fails_mental/)  | |downvotes: |  0 | missing: |  Nov. 1, 2013 midnight | |comments:  |  1 |
Portland-based Comcast hater checking in!
feh, demoknight doesn't really counter pyro. both his primary (if he doesn't use the booties) and his melee are countered by the m2 button. It's annoying to play against charge n' targe because it takes forever to kill a demoknight if I don't have the shotgun, but in the worst of scenarios I'll just airblast the fucker into a corner where teammates can shoot him.
Really REALLY bad movie. Meant to be satire of horror films called Cabin in the Woods. This was one of the few amusing parts...
Yeah, but he was talking about the industry in general.
You need to go to BF4 in the Origin client then right click and do repair install to fix.  Worked for me
Just do it. See what she's about. You don't have to hook up with her straight off the bat. What's the worse that can happen?
Those are awesome ideas!   My Halloween was the same as every other day haha but I hope yours was wonderful &lt;3
I don't have a Chansey Safari, but if you could add me for Palpitoad that would be awesome
This isn't really an answer to your question, but the haunted houses are generally open this weekend (post-Halloween) as well.  So, if you have free time this weekend you could still check them out.
 Should be /r/whatcouldgoright? Everything else was already very, very wrong.
Added both of you!
Mr. Fratastic: You are an asshole and a moron...
Childfree people on reddit act like you are personally offending them when you want kids/have kids.
This scene always scared the crap out of me. 
This one might be a good start: [**Twelve Examples of Illusion**](http://books.google.com/books?id=TZjGjj8gqB0C&amp;printsec=frontcover#v=onepage&amp;q&amp;f=false) by Westerhoff.  &gt;&gt;Tibetan Buddhist writings frequently state that many of the things we perceive in the world are in fact illusory, as illusory as echoes or mirages. In Twelve Examples of Illusion, Jan Westerhoff offers an engaging look at a dozen illusions--including magic tricks, dreams, rainbows, and reflections in a mirror--showing how these phenomena can give us insight into reality. For instance, he offers a fascinating discussion of optical illusions, such as the wheel of fire (the "wheel" seen when a torch is swung rapidly in a circle), discussing Tibetan explanations of this phenomenon as well as the findings of modern psychology, and significantly clarifying the idea that most phenomena--from chairs to trees--are similar illusions. The book uses a variety of crystal-clear examples drawn from a wide variety of fields, including contemporary philosophy and cognitive science, as well as the history of science, optics, artificial intelligence, geometry, economics, and literary theory. Throughout, Westerhoff makes both Buddhist philosophical ideas and the latest theories of mind and brain come alive for the general reader.
Your submission has been automatically removed because it is too short (Rule E). Your submission must contain a minimum of 500 characters to be approved.  Try answering the following questions in your post:    1) Why do you hold your view?    2) Is there any evidence you can use to support your view?  See the [wiki page](http://www.reddit.com/r/changemyview/wiki/rules#wiki_rule_e) for more information, and either resubmit or [message the moderators](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fchangemyview) once your thread has been edited appropriately for it to be approved.  Be sure your post also follows the other submission rules, or your submission may be automatically removed again. Thank you.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fchangemyview) if you have any questions or concerns.*
No, the most surreal view is just after you've driven through the worlds longest road tunnel (Lærdal Tunnel, Norway - 15 miles long) and you are suddenly surrounded by light and air again.  Also, the interior of this tunnel is cool because it has a few colorfully lit sections to break up the monotomy.  Example: http://www.roeland.dk/holiday/norge2003/theo/medium/Laerdal-Aurland4.jpg
They should organise some sort of pass to let them out on the roads, or perhaps they could get them to wear some sort of insignia, just so people know these are law abiding motorcycle riders.  A star perhaps.
...as long as they're shaped properly
I know it's not typical MFA, but I wanted to try something new. Any feedback + tips would be appreciated!  For the last one, not sure what shoes to wear. I need to step my shoe game up!  http://imgur.com/a/6tJLq
Don't forget that not all people on a sex offender registry are there for pedophilia. Statutory rape (ie, 20 y/o having sex with a consenting 16 y/o), and indecent exposure (peeing in public) would be two examples of much less significant ( and non-violent) crimes that could still land someone on the sex offender registry.
Jared Diamond's book "Gun's, Germs, and Steel" takes a pretty detailed look at this. His argument is that civilizations arise and become powerful when and where they do because of a fortuitous set of circumstances such as fertile land, animals that can be domesticated, and distribution of natural resources.  It basically comes down to luck of the draw: who got the best spots.
Looking at the price of ps4, its $500 for the console, controller, one game, and PS+.  For $500 I could get a gtx 760, 256gb ssd, and the two free games with the graphics card.  Thats $450, I can almost fit in another 8 gigs of ram, and that would be a massive overhaul to my machine + 2 games.  It would dramatically outperform the ps4, and all my current games are 100% compatible without any issues.  I just can't justify getting the console.
but what I'm saying is that if you never physically arrive in the past of your universe you haven't time travelled at all right?
At least he doesn't have the balance of power, it would have been horrible if this happened in 2010. 
Now I know! :)
Sadly, Patriot, yes there is. http://www.google.com/url?sa=t&amp;source=web&amp;cd=2&amp;ved=0CC8QFjAB&amp;url=http%3A%2F%2Fen.m.wikipedia.org%2Fwiki%2FCommunist_Party_USA&amp;ei=eu5yUqeYD8TOkQfr0IBo&amp;usg=AFQjCNGn4a-D1eNrD6Fgg0A81jtpObXtJA&amp;sig2=CUHDlqZDNtz0tZpiWtlxrA
I need a cannon that shoots money
So because Wii U and Xbox One run the same resolution on *some* games they are equal graphically? You're incorrect, my friend.
If I used Twitter, I'd totally follow you.
You don't play many games, do you?
So did he call up the newspaper when he realized his mistake? That wouldve been awkward
Powr Tochr by pink floyd is a good one.
gold silver and other physical asset classes.
How much do you hear from the coaches now? Especially Coach Hiestand.
Is there like a tf2jump subreddit? That would be sick
Yea that's a really good point. Oh well I don't really care if the guns are on the costume really. Thanks for the pointers!!
So you're telling me that because you know of 1 instance of a man sweeping another woman off her feet while she was in another relationship OP should try and pursue her (this is a grown up thought) but my thoughts of 2 consensual adults having an open relationship is immature (I know more than 1 couple that don't mind their SO fool around as long as it doesn't affect their relationship) Ok, I see how this works...  You see, a turtle is just that, and if OP doesn't go out and meet other people he could be missing out on the greatest thing to ever happen to him (no way right?). You will grow down one day and realize that he's not sweeping anybody off their feet, and all he is doing is being a backstabbing snitch. You really don't think that if the roommate's gf and OP were meant to be (what a romantic thought) they would be together by now?  Or do you think that she will magically look at him as the greatest thing to ever happen to her as soon as he rats out his roommate?
This is not a correct interpretation of the gold standard.  This person is assuming our gold reserves will cover our fiscal deficits, and lead us to an economic recovery.  That will not happen.  What gold standard advocates say will happen is that global investment faith in the dollar will be at an all time high, and increase portfolio and direct investment to the United States.  The rate at which dollars will be redeemable for gold can still be regulated so as not to encourage deflation.  Why is having a system that imposes fiscal responsibility on our government a bad idea?  You do realize that the only reason Nixon got rid of the gold standard was because investors lost faith in the US's ability to pay back their debts?  And Nixon was unable to finance Vietnam as a result without being able to create wealth out of thin air?
But...But it is ingrained in the psyche...
Added!
I strongly disagree with the above.
What a brave man...  He will be missed.  The vigilantes are self-employed, meanwhile the cartels are funded by the American drug consuming public...billions of dollars every year, trickling in from across a nation of hard-core to recreational drug users.   
That's what I thought. Especially depressing also because apparently my droid razr maxx hd is never getting 4.4... or any other update. Might have to learn how to rom my phone soon...
Honestly I wouldn't mind listening to the Russian woman talk.
J'ai une télévision mais je n'ai aucun intérêt pour le câble.  Ce qui passe à la télévision ici m'ennuie à mourir et c'est pire pour ce qui est de la télévisons américaine. Je l'utilise pour jouer au ps3 out regarder des films ou les rares séries qui m'intéressent. 
Cool where about ?
&gt;(I've never had blue cheese in a burger)  Whoa, are you in for a treat. I like to put a bit of bacon or prosciutto on blue cheese burgers. The caramelized onions will provide enough moisture, as *should* the meat, if cooked "properly".  What kind of buns are you serving it on, anyway?
Couldn't you instead implement a function were the individual her/himself can chose to "lock" their emblem from copying?  And worth mentioning is that it took me about 15 min to come up with a new way to copy emblems, and I'm sure that I'm not the only one. What I'm saying is that if people really don't want their emblems to be copied your "quick-fix" won't prevent this. I'm a big fan of your game and believe that you can think up a way better solution than the current one.  //Svensk krigare
3100
I disagree entirely. If you want practical skills, do a vocational degree like software engineering. CS should be theoretical.
It's actually a technique called matching that's used in psychotherapy, specifically in NLP &amp; Life Coaching. It's real, but using it to get girls is shady.
Yeah she is.
 This link appears to have been removed from /r/politics by either the spam filter or moderators.  ---  [Even in Canada the health system fails mental health patients and their families. How can we stop things like this from happening? [The Boy Who Killed His Mother - Schizophrenia Documentary]](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1pngjz/even_in_canada_the_health_system_fails_mental/)  submitted 53 minutes ago by: [ChainOfTitle](/user/ChainOfTitle) to [politics](/r/politics)  ---  **[Confirm it's missing](/r/politics/search?q="Even%20in%20Canada%20the%20health%20system%20fails%20mental%20health%20patients%20and%20their%20families.%20How%20can%20we%20stop%20things%20like%20this%20from%20happening%3F%20%5BThe%20Boy%20Who%20Killed%20His%20Mother%20-%20Schizophrenia%20Documentary%5D"&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)** | **[Message the moderators about this removal](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Spam%20filtered%20in%20/r/politics%20%3A%20Even%20in%20Canada%20the%20health%20system%20fails%20mental%20health%20patients%20and%20their%20families.%20How%20can%20we%20stop%20things%20like%20this%20from%20happening%3F%20%5BThe%20Boy%20Who%20Killed%20His%20Mother%20-%20Schizophrenia%20Documentary%5D&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1pngjz/even_in_canada_the_health_system_fails_mental/)** | **[Post to PoliticalModeration](/r/PoliticalModeration/submit?title=/r/politics%20%5Bspam%20filtered%5D%20Even%20in%20Canada%20the%20health%20system%20fails%20mental%20health%20patients%20and%20their%20families.%20How%20can%20we%20stop%20things%20like%20this%20from%20happening%3F%20%5BThe%20Boy%20Who%20Killed%20His%20Mother%20-%20Schizophrenia%20Documentary%5D&amp;url=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1pngjz/even_in_canada_the_health_system_fails_mental/)**   |     |  | |     |  | ------------|-----|-|-----------|-----| created: |  Oct. 31, 2013 11:07 p.m. | |score:  |  1 | first seen: |  Oct. 31, 2013 11:51 p.m. | |upvotes:   |  1 | last seen:  |  [[LIKELY SPAM FILTERED]](/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Spam%20filtered%20in%20/r/politics%20%3A%20Even%20in%20Canada%20the%20health%20system%20fails%20mental%20health%20patients%20and%20their%20families.%20How%20can%20we%20stop%20things%20like%20this%20from%20happening%3F%20%5BThe%20Boy%20Who%20Killed%20His%20Mother%20-%20Schizophrenia%20Documentary%5D&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1pngjz/even_in_canada_the_health_system_fails_mental/)  | |downvotes: |  0 | missing: |  Nov. 1, 2013 midnight | |comments:  |  1 |
Have to delete some people to add people. It may take some time to add everyone. I don't want to delete something and lose it D:
please add me dont have any friends :(
True, but I'd be willing to sacrifice pacing for Unicorn on TV.
when i got rp from referrals and it wasnt a time when the store and site are under a lot of stress it took like a day or two. Just be patient
IT'S A DEBILITATING ADDICTION MIRACLE!!!
Samuel L Jackson and Arnold Schwarzenegger? Did I spell that right?
Break his jaw, he can't eat except through a straw. Remove all straws from the restaurant. Problem solved.
Let's look at the article: "97% of terminal cancer patients have had a root canal." What's the source of that statement? There are lots of similar statements: 93% of women with breast cancer had root canals, based on athree-year study of 300 breast cancer cases, but not source is given.  &gt; Dr. Jones claims that toxins from the bacteria in an infected tooth or jawbone are able to inhibit the proteins that suppress tumor development.   But no study is cited.  &gt; Dr. Josef Issels reported that, in his 40 years of treating “terminal” cancer patients, 97 percent of his cancer patients had root canals.  So this is the apparent source of the headline. Dr. Issels has a [wikipedia page here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Josef_Issels), which mentions that he was charged with fraud and manslaughter for his promises of cancer cures and the subsequent deaths of his patients. He was convicted, according to the article, but it was overturned because he believed he could cure cancer. He was, however, wrong. Among his better known patients is the late [Bob Marley](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bob_Marley#Illness_and_death). I'll leave it to redditors to make their own judgment on Dr. Issels's credibility.  &gt; More than 25 million root canals are performed every year in this country  "How Stuff works" says there are 15 million performed annually, citing the American Association of Endodontists. [source](http://health.howstuffworks.com/wellness/oral-care/procedures/root-canal-procedure.htm) Either way, it's a lot. My wife has had two.  &gt; Weston A. Price: World’s Greatest Dentist  Okay, here's a claim. Not surprisingly, [Dr. Price has a wikipedia page](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Weston_A_Price), too. He died in 1948, and most of his theories about infection did, too. Dr. Price advanced the   &gt; theory of focal infection, which held that systemic conditions, including complexion, intestinal disorders, and anemia could be explained by infections in the mouth.   Source: the wikipedia page. Continued research by others, however, showed that "the research of Price and others suffered from technical limitations and questionable interpretations of results." "Compared to modern research, Price's studies lacked proper control groups, used excessive doses of bacteria, and had bacterial contamination during teeth extraction, leading to experimental biases."  Same source; I've omitted footnotes.  World's greatest dentist? I'd like some verification of that.  &gt; finally one endodontist named George Meinig recognized the importance of Price’s work and sought to expose the truth.  Dr. Meinig is mentioned on the wikipedia page about [focal infections](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Focal_infection_theory)  &gt; Drawing severe criticism in the 1930s, focal infection theory, whose popularity far outstripped evidence, was generally discarded in the 1940s amid overwhelming evidence of its general falsity, whereupon dental restorations and root canal therapy became again favored.  &gt; A European source places Meinig among three authors who, in the early 1990s, independently renewed concern about endodontic therapy promoting disease systemically.[45] Yet there remained a lack of carefully controlled studies, and no investigations had definitely established adverse systemic effects. *** Still, even by 2010, "the potential association between systemic health and root canal therapy has been strongly disputed by dental governing bodies and there remains little evidence to substantiate the claims".  My recommendation is that when you see articles such as this, you read the article with a search window open and look up the people who are quoted and look at the source of the claims, if any sources are given. If not sources, dive into your favorite search engine and check for yourself.  Best wishes.  source: Dr. Meinig's page; footnotes omitted.
"So far, yes. Although I'm having a very hard time recognizing anyone." She said, laughing slightly and scratching the back of her head.
I like how you remember the frog, but not the two dead children.
Yes, I did. There is the general idea that men can be seduced by women, and if this happens, it's the woman's fault. No, if you cheat on your wife with your underage student, that's your own fault. The amount of people defending this is just insane.
Doubtful that this is a fireable offence unless you have a PI that Is a complete ass. Mistakes are made all the time in the lab, and aseptic technique is one of the hardest things to learn well in the lab, unless you have an excellent teacher. In my experience most people in the lab have very little understanding of the best practices to keep a monoculture. I come from a micro background, but work in immunology now. I swear if these people don't have some sort of drug cocktail in their culture they can't manage to keep it uncontaminated.  That said, I would recommend you grow up some frozen stock, in fresh media that you have just prepared and autoclaved. Look up aseptic technique and carefully follow the rules. See if your frozen stock is contaminated. If it is, tell your PI. There are ways to rescue a strain from a mixed culture. And for gods sake find a competent microbiologist in a nearby department to help out.
Totally OK - just check out your guys' matchups for the playoffs and sit tight. In my league another team gambled on Ray Rice and bought low... If I owned him I would try and move him to someone who thought he was getting a deal and upgrade sneakily that way. Depending on the rest of your league, you may not need to make many moves. Maybe dangle Boykin to the Cobb/James Jones owner?
Got through first 100.  Today was a good day
Banana covered in peanut butter and dipped in grape nuts. 
I'd take Prater over him. 
there's a subreddit for this purpose, if you want to cross-post it, or read other people's [unsent letters](http://reddit.com/r/unsentletters)  Why don't you want to send these? Or at least cover the same topics with them? If you don't want to say, I completely understand
That's no woman, baby... That's a *man*, man!
My entire junior year in high school my US history teacher taught black history the entire time.  It wasn't in the curriculum, but it was important to him because he was an older black guy and it wasn't exactly *not* in the curriculum either.  It was important for me to learn and to be honest, I didn't really miss out on anything. How much did you learn from your traditional US history class?  Did any of it matter?  Would you feel like you missed out if it was not taught, and instead you get taught about guys and gals you might not otherwise have heard of?  My school (early 90s) had a bit of a racial problem because I came from an area that was nationally recognized for racial segregation (we're much better now) and they started bussing black students from a low-income area to a school that was predominantly white students from a low-income area.  Racial tensions were pretty high.  I think this teacher helped bring us together, even if only a tiny bit.  
Just keep a picture of him open in another window. Same effect.
I just find this extremely sad. Who knows what this woman went through? 
Same here, I was so close to being able to afford to go but got slammed with car repairs right before the tickets came out.
I do hope the ends were insulated...
&gt; ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ Give DIRETIDE  ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ Give DIRETIDE   ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ Give DIRETIDE   ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ Give DIRETIDE༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ Give DIRETIDE  ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ Give DIRETIDE  ༼ つ ◕_◕ ༽つ Give DIRETIDE
Well I'm.in high school so it's mine as well. Hello, friend.
Sometimes women can't help being sexy, and it's a shame they can't see through our eyes, to understand we're hard-wired to respond.
Hey, but we can all agree that Windows 8 is an unmitigated piece of shit, right? RIGHT EVERYONE? EVERYONE? **DAE HAET WINDOWS 8?!**
This. So much "this" it isn't even funny. 
So is it if you tow the person or if you get near them?
Absolutely! That'd be the best / cheapest way of doing it without a last if you ask me.
Sounds good, as long as it can be done within the hour heh, have class. Also would you prefer Intimidate or Flash Fire?
No.   "The craft brewing sales share in 2012 was 6.5% by volume and 10.2% by dollars."   Big change but still a drop in the beer sales bucket across the nation. Some states are way ahead of us, like Michigan, but there's still bud or miller beside every craft brew. 
Why is it his fault that she can't parse her problems of other people not listening to her from her distinct relationship with him?  Sounds to me like she was just making a general excuse because she couldn't tell him what was really bothering her.  And if we are to take her at her word, then she's just emotionally immature.  Either way, he dodged a bullet.  No adult wants to put up with that kind of immaturity. 
$34 for a pair of socks?
It's fun to think about how driverless vehicles will change the transportation landscape, but I think a lot of people are being overly optimistic with their predictions.  For one, expecting such a dramatic change in a mere 10-20 years I think is unrealistic. Even if the technology is ready by then, it will take even more time for people to adopt it. I think many people will be reluctant to use driverless cars that they have minimal control over (and that don't break driving laws where they would).  We also don't know what kind of regulatory environment will surround driverless cars, either. Will they be required by law to keep a certain distance from other cars, for example?  I can see driverless vehicles replacing transit service in many places, but I think they will do the most good in cities that aren't particularly well served by transit. I don't see it replacing transit in denser cities that are currently very well served. Driverless vehicles might become a huge hit in a city like Spokane, but they're never going to replace the Yamanote Line in Tokyo.  Regardless, I do think that driverless vehicles may be a catalyst for better urban and even suburban design with more walkable neighborhoods and fewer massive parking lots, which I think we can all agree is a very good thing.
Devtome.  Write and earn devcoins, which you can convert into bitcoins, gold or silver.
As someone who came from traditional DAWs:  no.  I really don't understand where you're coming from.  I mean, if you wanna do some soundscape and really get that synth sound you've been working on then the maschine isn't the right tool, but I'm still definitely in love with my maschine.  You know you can open it in DAWs right?  I run maschine standalone to do what I want and then save it and open it up in logic.  Best of both worlds my ninja.
Title: Dismemb  From: st871622@pip.cc.brandeis.edu (not him again) Subject: RE: Aircraft Dismemberments IV Date: Wed, 3 Aug 1994 19:33:54 GMT   temert@eis.calstate.edu (Tim J Emert) writes:  : Well, we dropped it in a plastic baggie and put it on ice  (teacher also : cut his finger off once, so knew what to do. Keep it cold  and dry. : Right, Tae?) and sent him off to the emergency room, who took  one look : at the mangled chunk of meat in the baggie and threw it in the  trash.   Absotively correct. You _could_ actually wrap the amputated part in gauze moistened with saline, but let's be serious for a moment: who the hell keeps saline around? Very rarely are amputated parts less than a 1/4 inch in length re-attached. It simply isn't worth the effort. And if the part is mangled or really dirty - forget it.  ObAside: I was once called to a posh home in Wellesley, MA, for a report of an 'amputation.' Upon arrival, I found a fourty-ish year-old women with an ENORMOUS bandage covering her hand. The fire department said that they recovered the amputated part, and had it on ice. I asked to look at the part, and saw the tip of the woman's finger in a platic bag. Twasn't more than, oh say, 1/8 inch in length.  "Uh ma'am, I hate to say this - but I doubt that they'll be able to re-attach such a small piece back on."  "But they've GOT TO - I'm a concert violinist!"  "Well, we'll take it with us - but no promises."  After getting to the hospital, the surgeon took one look at this 'tip' and said:  "Sorry - can't do anything with this," and promptly dumped the baggie into the trash.  The grief-stricken woman stared straight ahead and said:  "I'll never play the violin again."  Most of the staff made their excuses and left the room - unable to stifle the urge to laugh.  - Tae
I am so sorry. I wouldn't feel comfortable being around him either! Glad you're not in that situation anymore. -hugs-
on my way
Pass. 
Because Microsoft has fucked up in the past big time, while sony hasn't 
Dude get a high powered air rifle some of them are fucking serious. The projectile makes some noise(most of these rifles break the sound barrier) but no bang like a normal gun.
Sounds awesome! it's incredible over here in the fall!
A married bachelor.
Good looking out, pal.
While I consider that phrase racist, I did learn recently that in many areas, it's not.  So it's entirely possible /u/levywife is from an area where that's not racist.  
All in all we're just a nother brick in the wall. 
SCIENCE!
added :D 3067-5618-5524
I am going to ask these girls I have been wanting to be friends with for a while to sit with them at lunch tomorrow. Thank you, I'm glad to know it could work :)
Well if you are going to rationalise cutting your penis by saying it slightly decreases the chance to get a rare form of cancer you deserve a stupid answer.
Accidentally smooshing the home/back button when playing Xelorians is infuriating - so glad to see this problem won't be around for much longer.
Mix baking soda with 3-4 parts water (or adjust it to whatever is best for you) and scrub it into your hair like you would with shampoo.
Try it with rookworst and some bacon, then you have zuurkoolstamppot!
KS gave me zero feels or HNNNGs.  I did relate to Hisao and Hanako pretty well though.
take your time man! I'm in no hurry. You can even leave it for another day, I'll keep it reserved for you. Enjoy your night out!
That's actually quite funny. Bravo!
I'm not really in the Haxe scene (although somewhat familiar with Ash), but I am interested in how you combine Ash and HaxePunk/HaxeFlixel. I thought you would just be better off choosing one or the other. My approach would have been to just use Ash on top of the OpenFL API. What advantages do you get from integrating it with HaxePunk/HaxeFlixel?
CHINESE COMMUNIST FORCES DETECTED. PROBABILITY OF MISSION HINDRANCE: ZERO PERCENT. *shoots down a Vertibird*
Patrick Stewarts life seems so nice.
Kwanghee
You cant lick your own asshole. so there.
[FUCK YEAH](http://i.imgur.com/AR1xc.jpg)
I wish a DICE employee would respond to this post and say they are looking into these issues. Then maybe I'd be at ease with spending more money on premium...
*sigs* sorry
Nice try.
I think I want the "my city" song back instead of this...
For those who are interested, here is an album of the [shield development](http://imgur.com/a/SSLUv)! :)   Also, we did not forget the hat, Link simply would not have it! [Here's proof.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3ec1VzCq3RY)
I died when Ross skipped over the WIDE OPEN GOLDEN DOOR in one of the earlier episodes x.x
Need a local to help you out?  Lol
&gt;This rebuke is prideful and haughty.  hahahahahahaaaa
Nice try Comcast PR Firm guy.  EVERYONE knows across the board that your "Fast speeds" are crap compared to what you could be enjoying if there wasn't such a monopoly with the current system.  Seriously, your fastest speeds are but a fraction of what Gigabit internet and Google Fibre are able to provide. Jinxed isn't it, education on the subject matter is more like what you are needing.   Edit: relevant info -   Comcast internet specs in your area - Blast!® Get download speeds up to **[50 Mbps](https://www.comcast.com/shop/buyflow2/productsexisting.cspx?mode=PASMODE&amp;&amp;Inflow=1)** and upload speeds up to **10 Mbps**.  XFINITY WiFi – Stay connected at over 100,000 XFINITY WiFi and CableWiFi hotspots at no extra cost. XFINITY Connect with 7 e-mail accounts, each with 10GB of storage. Backed by the 30-Day Money-Back Comcast Customer Guarantee.  Google Fiber Pricing in UT -   Internet Speed - Gigabit   Up to 1 gigabit [\(**1,000 Mbps**\)](https://fiber.google.com/cities/provo/plans/) upload &amp; download speed  Price - $70.00 monthly / $30 construction one time fee (Setup)   As you can see, literally you are a small fraction of what is capable and the speed that Google is sporting isn't something that would cost a ridiculous amount of money to implement.  They simply don't want to change how things are and keep competition out.
You forgot the VBFS...  This is an awesome banner, though!
This is a perfectly acceptable use of "surreal."
&gt;how are people so placid?  Life is too short and too long for us to go through it angry at things we can't control.  I choose, instead, to live the dream.  "Living the dream", to me, means taking care of my responsibilities and doing what I want to do to the best of my circumstantial ability.  Nothing else really matters.
The newest episode of It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia has this happen to Charlie.
ah, i've got you registered already, i'll do you now then :)
He has all the skins already. But.. he can give away SKINS. OMG. 
Welcome to Reddit!
It all depends on the job. Currently I'm salaried. One of the previous jobs was contract, but most jobs have been hourly. I'm salary now because I'm in charge of a department. The last job wanted to counter the offer when I told them I was leaving, but if it takes the threat of an employee walking in order to renegotiate, you're doing it wrong. When I had accepted the job they said we would reassess my compensation after I pulled their collective asses from the fires of relentless deadline. They didn't reassess until I turned in my notice. 
Well that makes me feel much better.
Wait wait wait, the zoya factory is in Cleveland!?!?!?!?!?!??!?!?!??!?!?!?!?!  I was living an hour from their the last two years! Dammit!!!!
It you're of a cooking persuasion, I make these all the time and especially keep some on hand for hiking. You can make all sorts of substitutions for personal preference and what you have on hand. Can also be bought at cost co.  http://centerstagewellness.com/aussie-bites/
/thread
